HURRICANE  KATRINA 

AND  COMMUNICATIONS  INTEROPERABILITY 

S.  HRG.  109–1138 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  29,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

66–932 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 29, 2005  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Boyd, David G., Ph.D., Director, Office for Interoperability and Compatibility, 
Department of Homeland Security  .....................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Carter,  Willis,  First  Vice  President,  Association  of  Public  Safety  Communica-
tions Officials, International (APCO); Chief of Communications, Shreveport 
Fire Department  ...................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Moran,  Kenneth,  Acting  Director,  Office  of  Homeland  Security,  Enforcement 
Bureau, Federal Communications Commission  .................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Orr,  Dereck,  Program  Manager,  Public  Safety  Communications  Systems,  Na-
...................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

tional Institute of Standards and Technology 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Nelson, Hon. Bill, U.S. Senator from Florida, prepared statement  .....................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
2 
4 
32 
34 
38 
3 
1 
4 

9 
11 

16 
18 

4 
6 

22 
24 

41 
41 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

HURRICANE  KATRINA  AND 

COMMUNICATIONS  INTEROPERABILITY 

THURSDAY,  SEPTEMBER  29,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:02  a.m.  in  room 
SD–562,  Dirksen  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We  have  a  whole  number  of  conflicts  this  morn-
ing,  gentlemen,  not  the  least  of  which  is  the  final  statements  on 
the floor for the nomination of Judge Roberts, but also we have sev-
eral  conference  committees  meeting.  And  I  doubt  we’re  going  to 
have great attendance here today. But the Senator from California 
and I might be able to stir it up a little bit. 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  We’re  going  to  have  government  witnesses  this 
morning,  and  the  afternoon  witnesses  will  be  industry  witnesses. 
The afternoon session is scheduled to start at 2:30. 

The  recent  hurricanes  have  shown  that  many  first  responders 
just cannot talk with one another, because their radios and commu-
nication  networks  have  been  inoperable.  Achieving  interoperability 
requires  a  great  many  things—coordination,  planning,  and  train-
ing; expert equipment; proper standards; and the spectrum to make 
certain they have the best available communications. 

Now,  this  is  important,  because,  on  a  specific  date,  the  broad-
casters  will  be  required  to  give  their  first  responders  24  MHz  of 
new  spectrum  in  a  700  MHz  band,  including  a  portion  of  that  for 
interoperability,  exclusively.  This  Committee  is  working  on  that 
bill. We hope to be able to consider it next week. And we hope that 
will bring about some additional funds that we may be able to use 
to deal with the interoperability problems. 

And I do want to thank the Louisiana delegation for their partici-
pation in this hearing. Senator Vitter agreed to chair the afternoon 
portion,  because  we  have  an  appropriations  bill  on  the  floor  this 
afternoon. 

Let  me  turn  to  Senator  Boxer  to  see  if  she  has  any  comments. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator  BOXER.  Could  you  just  repeat?  You  said  there’s  going  to 
be a bill that deals with interoperability. Could you just—I’m sorry, 
I  was  looking  at  my  statement.  I  didn’t  hear  the  details  of  what 
you said. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  If  you’re  talking  about  the  DTP  bill,  we’re  still 
wondering  whether  we  can  get  the  other  bill  done  in  time  to  take 
it up at the same time. 

Senator BOXER. Thank you. 
Well, Mr. Chairman, thank you very much for holding this hear-
ing to shine a light on a shocking deficiency in our emergency com-
munications system. And the time to find a solution is now. It was 
really  yesterday.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  it  was  the  day  before  yester-
day,  and  we  still  haven’t  done  it.  We  didn’t  learn  our  lesson  after 
the  1993  World  Trade  Center  bombing.  We  didn’t  learn  it  after 
September  11.  The  wildfires  raging  in  California  almost  2  years 
ago  didn’t  teach  us.  And,  parenthetically,  I’m  sad  to  report  we’ve 
got  a  wildfire  raging  out  of  control,  9,000  acres,  as  we  speak  here, 
near Los Angeles, in the—not the very populated areas, but threat-
ening populated areas. And, of course, as you mentioned, Hurricane 
Katrina shone a light on this. 

First-responders  to  all  these  disasters  were  so  challenged  by  the 
lack  of  interoperable  communications  that  hundreds  of  lives  were 
unnecessarily  and  tragically  lost.  And  some  of  those  lives  are  first 
responders themselves. Enough is enough. We don’t need any more 
failures. 

I’d  like  to  just  show  you—and  I  only  have  2  minutes  left  in  my 
remarks—a  chart  here,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I’d  like  the  Chairman 
to take a look at this. If there was an accident on the Golden Gate 
Bridge, something really terrible, an emergency on the Golden Gate 
Bridge—and  we  know  that  our  bridges  have  been  targeted  by  al 
Qaeda,  to  just  mention  that—there  are  17  different  agencies  that 
will  respond  to  such—and  they’re  all  terrific.  And  they  include  the 
U.S.  Coast  Guard,  they  include  local  people,  State  people,  and  the 
rest—fire  departments,  police,  highway  patrol.  Every  one  of  these 
agencies is stellar. But most of them can’t talk to one another. It’s 
just really wrong. We have to fix it, it seems to me. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator, would you allow me to interrupt you? 
Senator BOXER. Yes. 
The CHAIRMAN. Do you know why? They all buy their radios from 

the lowest bidder. 

Senator BOXER. Well, maybe we have to look into that. 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes. 
Senator BOXER. I tried to get funds for interoperable communica-
tions  systems  as  part  of  the  Rail  Security  bill.  This  Committee  re-
sponded,  everyone  on  this  committee.  But,  somehow  or  other,  it 
was dropped over in the House. And then, a really wonderful thing 
happened.  In  the  intelligence  bill—reform  bill,  with  Senator 
McCain’s  help,  we  did  pass  an  authorizing  program  for  $300  mil-
lion a year, and again it was dropped, in conference. 

So,  we  cannot  seem  to  go  right  over  that  goal  line,  and  that’s 
what  we  need  to  do.  And  I  hope,  Mr.  Chairman,  because  you  are 
effective  and  such  an  important  Member  of  the  Senate,  with  your 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

help  we  will  not  ignore  this  anymore.  If  there  are  problems  with 
procurement,  if  we  have  to  look  at  those  things,  absolutely  we 
should. 

Thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Our first panelist, Dr. Kenneth Moran, who’s the Acting Director 
of  the  Office  of  Homeland  Security,  Enforcement  Bureau,  of  the 
Federal  Communications  Commission;  Dr.  David  Boyd,  who  is  the 
Director  of  the  Office  for  Interoperability  and  Compatibility,  De-
partment of Homeland Security; Willis Carter, of the Association of 
Public-Safety  Communications  Officials,  APCO,  and  the  Chief  of 
Communications  of  the  Shreveport  Fire  Department;  and  Dereck 
Orr,  the  Program  Manager  of  the  Public  Safety  Communications 
Systems, National Institute of Standards and Technology. I’m sorry 
if I read them as they’re not seated at the table. 

First,  we  will  call  on  Senator  Rockefeller  to  see  if  he  has  an 

opening statement. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Oh, thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I didn’t see you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I yield to Senator Sununu. 
The CHAIRMAN. Were you here first? Sorry. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  Under  no  circumstances  would  that  be  appro-

priate. Go ahead, Senator. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Just  to  be  very  brief,  the  Conference  of 
Mayors  2004  surveyed  192  cities:  44  percent  reported  an  accident 
within  the  preceding  year  in  which  the  lack  of  interoperable  com-
munications  made  response  difficult,  49  percent  of  the  cities  are 
not  interoperable  with  State  police,  60  percent  are  not  interoper-
able  with  their  State  Emergency  Operations  Centers,  83  percent 
are not interoperable with the Federal law enforcement agencies— 
to wit, FBI, ATF, Border Patrol, et cetera—89 percent believe that 
funding is the most significant way out of that. 

We did have a couple of votes on the issue, which failed last year. 
And what happened in the Gulf Coast, I’m seeing on a much, much 
smaller  scale  in  West  Virginia.  Everything  is  communication.  Ev-
erything  is  communication.  Leaders  can’t  be  leaders,  mayors  can’t 
be  mayors,  governors  can’t  be  governors,  county  commissioners 
can’t  be  county  commissioners,  much  less  EMS,  unless  they  have 
a system that works and unless they can talk to each other. 

I  just  think  what’s  happening,  Mr.  Chairman,  is  just  an  enor-
mous statement that if we want America to be strong, we’ve got to 
start right here in our own country, and we’ve got to start with the 
protection  of  our  people.  And  that’s  called  protecting  our  people  in 
times  of  disasters  of  various  sorts.  And  that’s  not  just  weather, 
that’s—that  can  do  with  dirty  war,  you  know,  dirty  bombs,  things 
of that sort. 

So, this is a very important hearing. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Sununu? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
This  is  not  my  area  of  expertise,  but  I  think,  like  most  Ameri-
cans, I assumed that the Federal support and assistance regarding 
interoperability  had  a  bigger  impact,  at  least  than  it  appears  to 
have  had  in  the  wake  of  Hurricane  Katrina.  I  note,  in  one  of  the 
statements  presented  today,  that  the  figure  of  $1.5  billion  is  high-
lighted,  money  that’s  already  been  made  available  to  state  and 
local  governments  to  deal  with  this  problem.  I  know  billions  more 
have been made available for equipment grants through the COPS 
FAST  and  other  equipment-based  programs.  There  has  been  dra-
matic assistance to state and local agencies to deal with interoper-
ability.  And  it  is  very  unclear  to  me  why  we  are  so  far  behind  the 
curve,  or  seem  to  be  so  far  behind  the  curve,  still  today.  I  think 
everything  that  I  have  seen  and  read,  and  personal  visits  I  have 
made  with  public  safety  officials  at  the  state  and  local  level  indi-
cate  this  is  not  new  technology,  that  we  are  not  trying  to  reinvent 
the  wheel  here.  We’re  trying  to  develop  or  implement  basic  stand-
ards,  basic  systems  so  that  we  have  the  most  seamless  interaction 
between  first  responders  and  public  safety  officials  at  Federal, 
State, and local level. 

And  I  hope  that  the  testimony  today  will  provide  some  honest, 
objective  clarity  as  to  why  we  haven’t  done  more  to  achieve 
progress  in  this  area  with  all  of  the  money  that’s  already  been 
made available. 

Yes,  there  may  be  need  for  additional  resources.  I  think  first  we 
need  an  honest  accounting  of  how  the  money  that  has  been  made 
available for this purpose has been used, and why more hasn’t been 
done with it. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Could we now proceed with the statements? 
Senator Dorgan, do you wish to make an opening statement? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. No, thank you. Not at this time. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Our first witness is Kenneth Moran. 
Mr. Moran? 

STATEMENT OF KENNETH MORAN, ACTING DIRECTOR, 

OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY, ENFORCEMENT BUREAU, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Mr. MORAN. Good morning, Chairman Stevens and distinguished 

Members of the Committee. 

My  name  is  Ken  Moran,  and  I  serve  as  the  Director  of  the  Fed-
eral  Communications  Commission’s  Office  of  Homeland  Security.  I 
welcome this opportunity to discuss the ongoing efforts of the Com-
mission to promote and facilitate effective public safety communica-
tion, as well as interoperability. 

The  Commission  has  taken  several  steps  over  the  last  few  years 
to  promote  interoperability,  which  we  define  as  radio  communica-
tions  between  public  safety  agencies,  usually  of  different  jurisdic-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

tions,  in  furtherance  of  both  day-to-day  and  emergency  operations. 
To  further  interoperability,  the  Commission  has  provided  addi-
tional  spectrum  to  public  safety  entities,  we’ve  promoted  techno-
logical  developments  that  enhance  interoperability,  and  we  have 
provided  our  expertise  and  input  on  a  number  of  interagency  ef-
forts. 

The  Commission  has  designed  approximately  97  MHz  of  spec-
trum  for  mobile  public  safety  use  throughout  the  country.  This  in-
cludes  spectrum  in  the  150  MHz  band,  the  450,  700,  800  MHz 
bands, and the 4.9 GHz band. 

The CHAIRMAN. We can’t quite hear you. Can you pull that mike 

toward you a little bit? 

Mr. MORAN. OK. Sorry, Senator. 
In  addition,  the  Commission  has  designated  certain  channels  in 
these bands specifically for interoperability. Frequencies designated 
for  interoperability  include  channels  in  the  150  MHz,  450  MHz, 
700 MHz, and 800 MHz bands. 

In  addition,  although  not  specifically  designated  for  interoper-
ability, the 4.9 GHz band rules foster interoperability by providing 
a regulatory framework where traditional public safety entities can 
pursue  strategic  partnerships  with  others,  including  critical  infra-
structure entities, as necessary for the completion of their missions. 
Also,  once  the  800-MHz  transition  is  complete,  public  safety  enti-
ties  will  also  have  access  to  another  4.5  MHz  of  spectrum  in  the 
800 band. 

The Commission also has developed policies and rules to promote 
the sharing of spectrum. For example, the Commission’s rules per-
mit  the  shared  use  of  radio  stations  where  licensees  may  share 
their facilities on a nonprofit, cost-shared—with other public safety 
organizations, including Federal Government entities. 

In  addition  to  facility  interoperability  on  a  regional  basis,  the 
Commission  has  reallocated  television  spectrum  for  public  safety 
use  in  several  cities.  For  example,  the  Commission  recently  reallo-
cated spectrum in New York City. 

The  Commission  has  also  modified  its  rules  to  eliminate  regu-
latory  barriers  to  help  speed  introduction  of  software-defined  radio 
technology.  Radios  traditionally  have  been  built  with  unalterable 
hardware  components  that  perform  specific  functions.  SDR  tech-
nology  allows  radios  to  cover  mobile  frequency  bands  and  signal 
formats  by  simply  sending  different  software  instructions  to  a 
microprocessor,  instead  of  using  additional  frequently  bulky  and 
heavy  parts.  Because  software-defined  radios  can  use  multiple  fre-
quency  bands,  including  those  designated  for  interoperability,  they 
can be an important vehicle for improving interoperability for pub-
lic safety communications systems. 

Although  this  technology  is  not  yet  widely  available  for  public 
safety use, we are aware, through the SDR forum, that public safe-
ty  entities  and  industry  are  actively  exploring  these  applications. 
The Commission works with other Federal agencies in promoting 
public  safety  communications  and  interoperability.  For  example, 
the Commission has worked with the Department of Homeland Se-
curity’s  National  Communication  System  and  telecommunications 
providers to establish a regulatory framework that would facilitate 
wireless priority access service. Wireless priority services are espe-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

cially  important  during  major  disasters  and  emergencies  when 
wireless  networks  are  often  congested.  Under  the  wireless  priority 
active  service  rules,  authorized  national  security  and  emergency 
preparedness  personnel,  such  as  first  responders,  may  obtain  ac-
cess to the next-available wireless channels to originate calls. 

The Commission has also been working closely with the Informa-
tion  Administration  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s 
NCS  and  SAFECOM  to  pursue  initiatives  that  would  advance  the 
common goal of improving public safety communications interoper-
ability.  As  a  result  of  this  collaboration,  Federal,  State,  and  local 
governments have entered into strategic partnerships to plan, fund, 
and implement shared communications systems. 

As directed by the Intelligence Reform and Terrorism Prevention 
Act  of  2004,  the  Commission  is  conducting  a  study  to  assess  the 
spectrum  needs  of  emergency-response  providers.  As  part  of  this 
study,  the  Commission,  NTIA,  and  DHS  have  established  a  work-
ing  group  to  facilitate  the  Commission’s  assessment  of  the  short- 
term  and  long-term  needs  for  allocation  of  additional  portions  of 
spectrum  for  Federal,  State,  and  local  emergency-response  pro-
viders. 

In light of recent events, we are also looking closely to determine 
what  steps  we  can  take  to  address  this  critical  need.  Recently, 
Chairman  Martin  announced  his  intention  to  create  an  inde-
pendent expert panel to review the impact of Hurricane Katrina on 
the  communications  infrastructure.  This  panel  will  be  composed  of 
public  safety  and  communications  industry  representatives,  and 
will  make  recommendations  to  the  Commission  regarding  ways  to 
improve  disaster  preparedness,  network  reliability,  and  commu-
nications  among  first  responders,  such  as  police,  fire,  and  emer-
gency medical personnel. This panel will specifically be tasked with 
making recommendations regarding interoperability. 

In closing, the Commission will continue to work with other Fed-
eral  agencies  in  the  public  safety  community  to  identify  ways  in 
which it can promote and facilitate enhanced interoperability. 

I’d be happy to respond to your questions. 
Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Moran follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KENNETH MORAN,  ACTING DIRECTOR,  OFFICE OF 
HOMELAND SECURITY,  ENFORCEMENT BUREAU,  FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS 
COMMISSION 
Introduction 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Subcommittee: 
Good  morning.  I  am  Kenneth  Moran,  Acting  Director  of  the  Federal  Communica-
tions Commission (Commission) Enforcement Bureau’s Office of Homeland Security. 
I welcome this opportunity to appear before you to discuss the Emergency Alert Sys-
tem, or EAS. 

The  Commission  is  well  aware  that  an  effective  public  alert  and  warning  system 
is  an  essential  element  of  emergency  preparedness,  and  that  such  a  system  is  im-
possible  without  effective  communication  and  coordination  within  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment,  as  well  as  with  the  active  participation  of  the  states  and  the  private  sec-
tor.  Accordingly,  the  Commission  has  been  working  with  other  Federal  agencies, 
state  governments,  and  industry  to  ensure  that  the  American  public  is  provided 
with a robust, efficient, and technologically current alert and warning system. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Background 

7 

The  forerunner  of  our  current  Emergency  Alert  System  originated  in  the  early 
days of the Cold War when President Truman established the ‘‘CONELRAD’’ system 
as a means to warn the public of an imminent attack. Since that time, CONELRAD 
has given way to the Emergency Broadcast System, which in 1994 was replaced by 
EAS.  From  the  early  CONELRAD  days  to  the  present,  the  Commission  has  played 
a  critical  role  in  ensuring  that  the  President  of  the  United  States  would  be  able  to 
communicate  with  the  American  public  in  the  event  of  a  national  emergency.  To-
day’s EAS uses analog radio and television broadcast stations, as well as wired and 
wireless  cable  systems,  to  deliver  a  national  Presidential  message.  When  activated, 
EAS  would  override  all  other  broadcasts  or  cable  transmissions,  national  and  local, 
to deliver an audio Presidential message. This system is mandatory at the national 
level,  but  is  also  available  on  a  voluntary  basis  for  states  and  localities  to  deliver 
local emergency notifications. 

The Commission, in conjunction with the Federal Emergency Management Agency 
(FEMA)  and  the  National  Weather  Service  (NWS),  implements  EAS  at  the  Federal 
level.  Our  respective  roles  currently  are  based  on  a  1981  Memorandum  of  Under-
standing  between  FEMA,  NWS,  and  the  Commission,  on  a  1984  Executive  Order, 
and on a 1995 Presidential Statement of Requirements. 

The  Commission’s  EAS  rules  are  focused  on  national  activation,  and  the  delivery 
of a Presidential message. The Commission’s rules prescribe: (1) technical standards 
for EAS; (2) procedures for radio and television broadcast stations and cable systems 
to  follow  in  the  event  EAS  is  activated;  and  (3)  EAS  testing  protocols.  Under  the 
rules,  national  activation  of  EAS  for  a  Presidential  message  is  designed  to  provide 
the  President  the  capability  to  transmit  from  any  location  at  any  time  within  ten 
minutes of the system’s activation, and would take priority over any other message 
and preempt other messages in progress. Currently, only analog radio and television 
stations, and wired and wireless cable television systems, are required to implement 
the national EAS. Other systems, such as digital television (DTV), Direct Broadcast 
Satellite television (DBS), Low Earth Orbit (LEO) satellite systems, paging, Satellite 
Digital  Audio  Radio  Service  (SDARS),  and  In-Band-On-Channel  Digital  Audio 
Broadcasting (IBOC DAB) are currently not required to participate in EAS. 

The  decision  to  activate  the  national-level  EAS  rests  solely  with  the  President. 
FEMA  acts  as  the  White  House’s  executive  agent  for  the  development,  operations, 
and  maintenance  of  the  national  level  EAS  and  is  responsible  for  implementation 
of the national level activation of EAS, as well as EAS tests and exercises. 

EAS  is  essentially  a  hierarchical  distribution  system.  FEMA  has  designated  34 
radio  broadcast  stations  as  Primary  Entry  Point  (PEP)  stations.  At  the  request  of 
the  President,  FEMA  would  distribute  the  ‘‘Presidential  Level’’  messages  to  these 
PEP stations. The PEP stations are monitored in turn by other stations in the hier-
archical  chain.  Commission  rules  require  broadcast  stations  and  cable  systems  to 
monitor  at  least  two  of  the  EAS  sources  for  Presidential  alerts  that  are  specified 
in  their  state  EAS  plans.  Initiation  of  an  EAS  message,  whether  at  the  national, 
state,  or  local  level,  is  accomplished  via  dedicated  EAS  equipment.  The  EAS  equip-
ment  provides  a  method  for  automatic  interruption  of  regular  programming  and  is 
capable  of  providing  warnings  in  the  primary  language  that  is  used  by  the  station 
or cable system. 

Along with its primary role as a national public warning system, EAS—and other 
emergency notification mechanisms—are part of an overall public alert and warning 
system,  over  which  FEMA  exercises  jurisdiction.  EAS  use,  as  part  of  such  a  public 
warning system at the state and local levels, while encouraged, is voluntary. Never-
theless,  the  public  receives  most  of  its  alert  and  warning  information  through  the 
broadcasters’  and  cable  systems’  voluntary  activations  of  the  EAS  system  on  behalf 
of state and local emergency managers. 
Current Issues and the Commission’s Rulemaking Proceeding 

As noted above, the public relies heavily on EAS for emergency information. EAS 
therefore serves a critical purpose, but it currently only applies to analog radio and 
television stations, and wired and wireless cable television systems. In August 2004, 
the Commission began a rulemaking proceeding to review whether we need to either 
update EAS or replace it with a more comprehensive and effective warning system. 
In  initiating  its  rulemaking,  the  Commission  encouraged  commenters  to  consider 
recommendations  from  two  public/private  partnerships  that  have  studied  EAS 
issues extensively: the Media Security and Reliability Council (MSRC), an industry- 
led  Federal  Advisory  Committee  comprised  of  representatives  from  the  radio,  tele-
vision,  multi-channel  video,  public  safety,  and  disabilities  communities,  and  the 
Partnership  for  Public  Warning  (PPW),  a  not-for-profit,  public/private  partnership 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

that  was  incorporated  with  the  goal  of  promoting  and  enhancing  effective,  inte-
grated dissemination of public warnings. 

The  Commission  has  received  comments  from  numerous  interested  individuals, 
Federal entities, state and local emergency planning organizations, and various sec-
tors  of  the  telecommunications  industries.  We  have  coordinated  with  DHS  and  its 
component,  FEMA,  and  with  the  Department  of  Commerce  and  its  component,  the 
National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration’s  (NOAA)  National  Weather 
Service, and we will continue to do so. 

The  overarching  question  addressed  in  the  proceeding  is  whether  EAS  in  its 
present  form  is  the  most  effective  mechanism  for  warning  the  American  public  of 
an emergency, and, if not, how EAS can be improved. Most of the parties who com-
mented agree that our warning system should be improved. Most—including MSRC 
and  PPW—also  advocate  upgrading,  rather  than  replacing  EAS,  to  take  advantage 
of the existing EAS infrastructure. 

The  Commission’s  rulemaking  proceeding  addresses  a  number  of  specific  and 
timely issues. For instance, the Commission noted that some parties argue that the 
purely  voluntary  nature  of  EAS  at  the  state  and  local  level  results  in  an  incon-
sistent  application  of  EAS  as  an  effective  component  of  an  overall  public  alert  and 
warning system. To address these arguments, the Commission is examining wheth-
er  permissive  state  and  local  EAS  participation  remains  appropriate  today,  and 
whether uniform national guidelines should apply to state and local EAS implemen-
tation. Some parties who commented on this issue support continuing voluntary par-
ticipation, at least for the present, while the Commission considers broader changes 
to  EAS.  Some  parties  also  stated  that  participation,  though  voluntary,  is  wide-
spread. These parties generally support continuing the voluntary nature of EAS. 

The  Commission’s  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  initiating  the  open 
proceeding focused on the fact that EAS is currently mandated only for analog tele-
vision  and  radio,  and  for  cable  systems,  which  represent  an  increasingly  smaller 
part  of  our  information  sources.  The  Commission  is  considering  whether  and  how 
EAS  obligations  should  be  extended  to  services  not  currently  covered—e.g.,  digital 
television  and  radio,  and  satellite  radio  and  television.  Many  commenters  support 
the Commission’s efforts to extend the EAS rules to digital broadcasters. 

The  NPRM  also  asked  questions  about  whether  the  technical  capabilities  of  EAS 
can  or  should  be  applied  to  other  communications  platforms.  Along  with  digital 
broadcast,  new  digital  wireless  technologies,  including  cellular  telephony  and  per-
sonal digital assistants, are rapidly redefining the communications landscape, mak-
ing available to the public warning technologies that are far more flexible and effec-
tive  than  the  analog  broadcast  mechanism  currently  employed  by  EAS.  The  Com-
mission  is  considering  whether  there  should  be  an  effort  to  use  such  technologies 
to  form  a  comprehensive  national  public  warning  system  capable  of  reaching  vir-
tually  everyone  all  the  time  by  combining  EAS  with  alternative  public  alert  and 
warning  systems.  We  received  a  number  of  comments  about  methods,  such  as  cell 
phone  broadcasting,  that  could  expand  the  reach  of  our  warning  systems  in  the  fu-
ture. In their comments, DHS and FEMA also noted that they are investigating new 
technologies for this purpose. 

The Commission also is examining security and reliability issues relevant to EAS 
and on the important question of how best to supply an effective public warning sys-
tem  to  the  disabled  community  and  non-English  speakers.  The  Commission  is  also 
considering  the  role  of  various  Federal  Government  departments  and  agencies,  as 
well as local authorities, in implementing EAS. 

In addition, the Commission is involved in other initiatives, beyond its rulemaking 
proceeding,  to  address  the  effectiveness  of  our  Nation’s  warning  systems.  For  in-
stance,  the  Commission  is  participating  in  the  Task  Force  on  Effective  Warnings 
Materials,  a  group  of  Federal  departments  and  agencies  that  has  been  assembled 
to  examine  existing  and  planned  disaster  warning  and  communications  systems, 
and  to  make  recommendations  to  ensure  that  these  systems  are  effective.  We  will 
continue  to  share  our  expertise  and  views,  and  to  seek  the  expertise  and  views  of 
others, on these important issues. 
Conclusion 

The Commission looks forward to working with Congress, our colleagues at other 
Federal,  State,  and  tribal  agencies,  and  the  public  to  ensure  that  we  can  provide 
an effective and technologically advanced warning system to our citizens. The Com-
mission  also  is  aware  that  the  Congress  is  taking  an  active  interest  in  the  issue  of 
public alert and warning, and stands ready to provide whatever technical assistance 
that the Congress would find helpful in this regard. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

Dr.  Boyd,  we  had  you  next.  You’re  part  of  Homeland  Security, 

also, aren’t you? 

Dr. BOYD. Yes, sir, I am. 
The CHAIRMAN. Well, will you proceed, please? 

STATEMENT OF DAVID G. BOYD, PH.D., DIRECTOR, 

OFFICE FOR INTEROPERABILITY AND COMPATIBILITY, 

DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 

Dr.  BOYD.  Good  morning,  and  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and 
Members  of  the  Committee,  for  the  invitation  to  speak  to  you 
today. 

Interoperability  requires,  before  all  else,  simple  operability.  As 
Hurricane  Katrina  demonstrated,  in  the  absence  of  a  reliable  net-
work  across  which  responders  within  an  agency  can  effectively 
communicate,  interoperability  is  both  irrelevant  and  impossible. 
Some  seem  to  believe  the  introduction  of  new  technologies  alone 
can  solve  our  interoperability  problems.  But  adding  equipment  ad-
dresses only part of what a fully robust, reliable, and interoperable 
public safety communications system requires. 

For  example,  when  we  lose  towers,  first  responders  have  only 
their  mobile  or  portable  units  available,  so  range  is  dramatically 
reduced, and control of the incident is severely compromised. Port-
able  units  permit  some  short-range  communications,  provided  it’s 
been  planned  and  trained  for,  until  the  proprietary  battery  packs 
begin  to  fail  and  cannot  be  charged  because  the  chargers  are  typi-
cally  attached  to  the  power  grid.  9–1–1  centers  are  tied  to  the 
wired telephone networks, and so is the cellular system, which de-
pends  on  cell  phones  that  also  use  proprietary  batteries.  No  single 
fix  alone  can  address  all  these  elements,  and,  more  importantly, 
the planning and organizational elements. 

Many  solutions  have  been  offered,  and  many  claims  have  been 
made for each solution. But none is a silver bullet. Satellite phones 
are  extremely  useful  for  command  elements,  but  often  hopelessly 
impractical  for  individual  first  responders.  They  require  training 
and  signals  can  be  blocked  by  vegetation,  buildings,  terrain,  and 
even weather. They also use batteries that need recharging. And a 
first  responder  in  the  middle  of  a  rescue  or  up  to  his  armpits  in 
water will find the antenna hard, or impossible, to aim. 

Van  or  trailer-mounted  communications  systems  dropped  into 
the incident nearly always offer significantly less coverage than the 
original system, and may require significant training to use. 

And all of these, without solid prior planning, will add to the dif-
ficulties  of  achieving  interoperability  once  operability  is  achieved. 
We  believe  what  we’ve  developed  to  support  interoperability  can 
also  help  first  responders  successfully  navigate  any  communica-
tions  emergency.  We,  in  the  public  safety  community,  have  identi-
fied  six  key  building  blocks  required  to  achieve  interoperability: 
governance,  standard  operating  procedures,  technology,  training 
and  exercises,  routine  use  of  interoperable  systems,  and  cross-
cutting  all  of  these  is  the  sixth,  and  probably  most  important  ele-
ment, a high degree of leadership, planning, and collaboration, with 
a commitment to an investment in sustainability. 

To help public safety agencies, and especially the policy levels of 
government,  understand  the  interrelationship  of  all  of  these  fac-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

tors,  we  developed  a  tool  called  the  ‘‘interoperability  continuum.’’ 
This  planning  tool  explains  how  all  these  elements  relate  to  each 
other,  and  makes  clear  all  of  these  elements  need  to  be  addressed 
before, not during, an emergency. 

Interoperability  is  not  a  new  issue.  It  was  a  problem  in  Wash-
ington,  D.C.,  when  the  Air  Florida  flight  crashed  into  the  Potomac 
in  1982;  in  New  York  City,  when  the  Twin  Towers  were  first  at-
tacked  in  1993;  in  1995  when  the  Murrah  Building  was  destroyed 
in  Oklahoma  City;  and  in  1999,  at  Columbine.  Too  many  public 
safety personnel cannot communicate by radio because their equip-
ment  is  still  incompatible  or  the  frequencies  they’re  assigned  are 
different.  They  operate  on  ten  different  frequency  bands,  among 
communications  systems  that  are  often  proprietary  and  too  often 
30 or more years old. Over 90 percent of the Nation’s public safety 
wireless  infrastructure  is  financed,  owned,  operated,  and  main-
tained  by  the  more  than  60,000  individual  local  jurisdictions—po-
lice, fire, and emergency medical services—that serve the public. 

National efforts to fix the problem have historically been erratic, 
uncertain,  and,  until  recently,  uncoordinated.  Worse,  the  efforts 
have too often been designed without the direct involvement of the 
people  with  the  greatest  stake  in  effective  communications,  the 
first  responders  themselves.  The  attacks  on  September  11,  2001, 
made clear this had to change. 

Since September 11, significant progress has been made in inter-
operability,  thanks  to  the  priorities  both  the  Administration  and 
Congress have placed on it. In 2001, SAFECOM was established as 
a Presidential Management Initiative. In 2004, the Department es-
tablished  the  Office  for  Interoperability  and  Compatibility  to  fur-
ther strengthen and integrate interoperability and compatibility ef-
forts. And in the Intelligence Reform Act, Congress gave it a legis-
lative charter. 

While fixing the Nation’s interoperability problems will require a 
sustained  effort,  we  recognize  that  we  cannot  wait  to  move  things 
forward.  That’s  why  SAFECOM  has  initiated  a  number  of  near- 
term  initiatives,  including  working  with  the  National  Institute  of 
Standards  and  Technology  to  accelerate  the  development  of  stand-
ards, the interoperability continuum, and statewide planning tools: 
RapidCom, the program ably led by Dereck Orr of the NIST Office 
of Law Enforcement Standards while he was attached to my office, 
a  public  safety  architectural  framework,  creation  of  a  P–25  per-
formance  testing  program,  development  of  coordinated  grant  guid-
ance across all Federal grant programs, creation of a national base-
line,  and  identification  of  public  safety  spectrum  needs.  Mr.  Orr 
will provide more detail on some of these. 

This Nation is heavily invested in an existing infrastructure that 
is  too  often  inadequate  to  the  basic  communications  requirements 
of individual agencies and not interoperable. 

We must continue to pursue a comprehensive strategy that takes 
into  account  technical  and  cultural  issues  associated  with  improv-
ing  interoperability,  which  recognizes  the  challenges  associated 
with  incorporating  legacy  systems  and  practices  in  constantly 
changing  technology  and  cultural  environments  and  which  encour-
ages strong local leadership in ensuring that the needs of the front-
line of emergency responders, the first responders, are met. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Though  many  challenges  remain,  we  believe  we’ve  accomplished 
a great deal in the short time DHS has managed the program, but 
we believe a lot remains to be done. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Boyd follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID G. BOYD, PH.D., DIRECTOR, OFFICE FOR 

INTEROPERABILITY AND COMPATIBILITY, DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 

Introduction 

Good morning and thank you, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, for 

the invitation to speak to you today. 

Today’s testimony will focus on SAFECOM, a communications program of the Of-
fice  of  Interoperability  and  Compatibility  (OIC),  which  resides  in  the  Office  of  Sys-
tems  Engineering  and  Development,  Science  and  Technology  Directorate,  Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS).  SAFECOM  provides  development,  testing,  eval-
uation, guidance, research and assistance for local, tribal, state, and Federal public 
safety  agencies  working  to  improve  public  safety  response  through  more  effective 
and efficient interoperable wireless communications. (By public safety we mean fire, 
police,  emergency  medical  services,  emergency  managers,  and  others  who  have 
emergency response missions). Although SAFECOM is working with practitioners to 
develop  long-term  strategic  initiatives,  without  which  the  Nation  will  never  solve 
the  interoperability  problem,  we  all  know  terrorists,  natural  disasters  and  other 
emergencies will not wait for a comprehensive national solution so the program has 
been designed with near-, mid- and long-term goals. 

Communications  interoperability  refers  to  the  ability  of  public  safety  agencies  to 
talk across disciplines and jurisdictions via radio communications systems, exchang-
ing voice and/or data with one another on demand, in real time, as authorized. Un-
fortunately,  the  Nation  is  heavily  invested  in  an  existing  infrastructure  made  up 
largely of systems that are too often incompatible. To change this, efforts within the 
Federal  Government  to  address  the  interoperability  problem  are  being  coordinated 
by  SAFECOM  and  incorporate  the  needs  of  local,  state,  and  Federal  practitioners. 
But  there  are  no  immediate,  silver  bullet  fixes  to  the  financial,  technical  and  cul-
tural  challenges  that  face  us.  As  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  ac-
knowledged  in  a  July  2004  report,  communications  interoperability  is  a  long-term 
problem with no one-size-fits-all solution. 
Public Safety Communications Environment 

Interoperability  is  not  a  new  issue;  it  has  plagued  the  public  safety  community 
for  decades.  It  was  a  problem  in  Washington,  D.C.,  when  the  Air  Florida  flight 
crashed  into  the  Potomac  in  1982.  It  was  a  problem  in  New  York  City  when  the 
Twin  Towers  were  first  attacked  in  1993.  It  was  a  problem  in  1995  when  the 
Murrah  Building  was  destroyed  in  Oklahoma  City,  and  in  1999  at  Columbine.  The 
reality is that today, too many public safety personnel cannot communicate by radio 
with  personnel  from  other  agencies  or  disciplines  because  their  equipment  is  still 
incompatible, or the frequencies they are assigned are different. They operate on 10 
different  frequency  bands  and  run  communications  systems  that  are  often  propri-
etary,  and  that  are  too  often  30  or  more  years  old,  in  an  era  when  the  technology 
lifecycle is only 18 to 24 months. Over 90 percent of the Nation’s public safety wire-
less  infrastructure  is  financed,  owned,  operated,  and  maintained  by  the  more  than 
60,000  local  jurisdictions  that  provide  emergency  services  to  the  public  and  only  a 
very tiny fraction of this funding is Federal. National efforts to fix the problem have 
historically  been  erratic,  uncertain,  and  until  recently,  uncoordinated.  The  attacks 
on September 11, 2001, made clear this had to change. 

Since September 11, 2001, significant progress has been made to improve commu-
nications  interoperability  for  the  public  safety  community.  Yet  it  is  apparent  that 
more must be achieved. Much of this progress can be attributed to the priority that 
both  the  Administration  and  Congress  have  placed  on  solving  the  problem  of  com-
munications interoperability. In 2001, SAFECOM was established as a Presidential 
Management Initiative and charged with strengthening interoperability at all levels 
of government by coordinating Federal programs, initiating a comprehensive stand-
ards  program,  and  developing  a  national  architecture.  In  2004,  the  Department  es-
tablished OIC to further strengthen and integrate interoperability and compatibility 
efforts to improve local, tribal, state, and Federal public safety preparedness and re-
sponse. OIC was directed to: 

• Identify and certify all DHS programs that touch on interoperability; 
• Support the creation of interoperability standards; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

• Establish  a  comprehensive  research,  development,  testing,  and  evaluation 

(RDT&E) program for improving public safety interoperability; 

• Integrate  coordinated  grant  guidance  across  all  DHS  grant  making  agencies 

that touch on public safety interoperability; 

• Oversee  the  development  and  implementation  of  technical  assistance  for  public 

safety interoperability; 

• Conduct pilot demonstrations; 
• Create an interagency interoperability coordination council; and 
• Establish an effective outreach program. 

Long-Term Vision 

Practitioners  helped  SAFECOM  articulate  a  long  term  vision  for  interoperability 
which projects that, not later than 2023, first responders will operate on a national 
system-of-systems  using  standards-based  equipment  that  provides  the  capability  to 
respond to an incident anywhere in the country, using their own equipment, on any 
network, and on dedicated public safety spectrum. They will be able to communicate 
with  each  other  as  authorized  via  voice,  data,  and  video  on  demand  and  in  real 
time. Making this vision flesh will require work in five critical success areas, includ-
ing: 

1. A common set of guidelines and criteria for public safety communications sys-
tems in conjunction with a national architecture framework; 
2.  Coordinated  testing  and  evaluation  processes  to  ensure  communications 
equipment meets critical requirements; 
3.  Standardization  of  equipment  fortified  by  interim  grant  guidance  measures; 
4.  Coordinated  spectrum  policy  that  meets  the  needs  of  the  public  safety  com-
munity; and 
5. Certification of state communications plans. 

None  of  these  initiatives  will  be  accomplished  overnight,  but  many  of  them  are 

already beginning to strengthen interoperability in the public safety community. 
Near-Term Initiatives 

While  fixing  the  Nation’s  interoperability  problem  will  require  a  sustained  effort, 
we  recognize  that  we  must  quickly  ensure  sufficient  interoperability  at  all  levels  of 
government  to  meet  emergencies  of  any  kind.  To  do  this,  DHS  and  SAFECOM  has 
initiated a number of near-term initiatives, including development of the Interoper-
ability  Continuum,  development  of  statewide  planning  tools,  execution  of  the 
RapidCom  Initiative,  publication  of  a  national  statement  of  requirements,  creation 
of a conformance testing program, development of coordinated grant guidance for in-
clusion  in  every  Federal  grant  program,  creation  of  a  national  baseline,  identifica-
tion  of  public  safety  spectrum  needs,  development  of  emergency  response  plans  for 
immediate  communications  capabilities,  and  coordination  with  Office  of  State  and 
Local  Government  Coordination  and  Preparedness’  (SLGCP)  Interoperable  Commu-
nications Technical Assistance Program (ICTAP). 
Statement of Requirements and a National Architecture Framework 

Interoperability  plans  to  support  responses  to  an  incident  need  to  be  developed 
based  on  a  common  set  of  guidelines  and  criteria  for  public  safety  communications 
systems  and  these  should  be  aligned  with  a  national  architecture  framework.  Only 
when  these  guidelines  are  universally  recognized  and  followed  will  first  responders 
and  the  larger  public  safety  community  be  able  to  communicate  effectively.  To  that 
end, SAFECOM published Version 1.0 of the first ever comprehensive Public Safety 
Statement  of  Requirements  for  Communications  and  Interoperability  (SoR).  Devel-
oped  with  public  safety  practitioner  input,  the  SoR  defines  the  functional  require-
ments  for  public  safety  communications.  Subsequent  versions  will  further  refine 
these technical requirements so that industry will have a blueprint to which to build 
technologies  that  address  public  safety’s  needs.  This  SoR  also  serves  as  the  basis 
for  developing  a  national  architecture  framework  for  communications  interoper-
ability.  SAFECOM  is  working  to  develop  a  Public  Safety  Architecture  Framework 
(PSAF)  that,  with  the  SoR,  will  serve  as  a  tool  to  help  the  Nation’s  first  responder 
agencies understand the technical requirements and national migration path toward 
fully interoperable communications systems without imposing requirements that sti-
fle innovation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Coordinated Testing and Evaluation of Equipment 

The next step in achieving national communications interoperability is the devel-
opment  of  coordinated  testing  and  evaluation  processes  to  ensure  communications 
equipment  meets  the  critical  needs  of  first  responders.  Public  safety  is  faced  with 
many complex procurement decisions and frequently has to hope that the equipment 
they  buy  will  do  what  it  claims.  To  ensure  that  public  safety  is  able  to  truly  trust 
the  claims  made  by  vendors,  communications  equipment  needs  to  be  tested  and 
evaluated  based  on  first  responder  needs  and  capabilities.  To  do  this,  SAFECOM 
created  a  testing  and  evaluation  working  group  to  help  ensure  that  methodologies 
for  testing  and  evaluation  of  interoperability  products  are  technically  sound  and 
comparable  across  testing  laboratories.  The  working  group  members  are  practi-
tioners  and  subject  matter  experts  from  law  enforcement,  fire  services,  and  emer-
gency  medical  services.  These  members  help  review  and  develop  test  criteria  and 
serve the program by determining which products should be evaluated. 
Standardization of Equipment Fortified by Interim Grant Guidance 

Standardization  of  equipment  fortified  by  interim  grant  guidance  measures  is  an 
essential  step  in  achieving  communications  interoperability.  The  equipment  must 
adhere  to  communications  standards  that  allow  for  improved  interoperability.  As 
standards are created, funding solutions must also be implemented to help jurisdic-
tions meet interoperability goals and requirements. To better coordinate the funding 
of  interoperability  solutions,  such  as  purchasing  new  equipment,  developing  state 
plans,  or  other  activities,  we  resolved  a  major  hurdle  in  achieving  interoperability: 
conflicting  Federal  grant  guidance.  In  the  past,  Federal  grant  programs  for  public 
safety communications were not coordinated and too often resulted in the use of lim-
ited  Federal  resources  to  create  systems  that  made  interoperability  even  more  dif-
ficult to achieve. 

Our  coordinated  grant  guidance  outlines  eligibility  for  grants,  the  purposes  for 
which  grants  can  be  used,  and  guidelines  for  implementing  a  wireless  communica-
tions system in order to help maximize the efficiency with which public safety com-
munications related grant dollars are allocated and spent. To ensure consistency in 
interoperability  grant  solicitations,  this  guidance  has  been  included  in  grant  pro-
grams  administered  by  the  Department  of  Justice  and  other  agencies  within  DHS. 
Within DHS, the Office for State and Local Government Coordination and Prepared-
ness  (SLGCP)  reports  that  it  has  provided  more  than  $1.5  billion  in  direct  funding 
to local jurisdictions, urban areas, and states. SLGCP has three primary grant pro-
grams that have incorporated SAFECOM’s grant guidance on issues regarding com-
munications  interoperability.  These  programs  are  the  State  Homeland  Security 
Grant  Program,  Urban  Areas  Security  Initiative  Grant  Program,  and  the  Law  En-
forcement  Terrorism  Prevention  Grant  Program.  Many  of  the  system  procurements 
and  enhancements  supported  by  this  funding  are  still  being  implemented.  More 
thorough monitoring of these projects is required to ascertain whether they achieve 
their intended goals. 

It  is  important  to  note,  however,  that  although  SAFECOM  has  developed  con-
sensus  guidance  and  tools  to  improve  the  grant  making  process,  the  program  does 
not directly manage or provide funding to local or state agencies for communications 
projects. Grant guidance is an important step toward improving national interoper-
ability  because  it  helps  to  align  public  safety  communications  related  grant  dollars 
with the national effort to improve interoperability at all levels of government. 

OMB  also  requires  all  Federal  agencies  demonstrate  their  programs  are  fully 

aligned with SAFECOM guidance in developing their own communications plans. 
National Baseline of Public Safety Communications 

The National Interoperability Baseline study will provide the Nation’s first statis-
tically  significant,  quantitative  measurement  of  the  current  state  of  public  safety 
communications  interoperability.  The  development  of  the  survey  methodology  was 
initiated  in  January  2005  and  the  resulting  study  will  provide  an  understanding  of 
the  current  state  of  interoperability  nationwide  upon  completion.  Additionally,  it 
will serve as a tool to measure future improvements made through local, state, and 
Federal public safety communications initiatives. 

instrument  developed  for  Interoperability  Baseline  will  allow 
SAFECOM  to  identify  areas  with  interoperability  shortfalls,  track  the  impact  of 
Federal programs and measure the success of these programs, establish an ongoing 
process and mechanism to measure the state of interoperability on a recurring basis, 
and develop an interoperability baseline self-assessment tool for local and state pub-
lic safety agencies. 

The  survey 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

Coordinated Spectrum Policy That Meets the Needs of Public Safety 

Radio  spectrum  is  a  finite  resource—there  is  only  so  much  available  and  it  is 
shared by public safety, radio broadcasters, government users, and other commercial 
and  private  consumers.  The  large  demand  for  this  resource  can  lead  to  over-
crowding,  which,  in  turn  can  cause  delays  in  or  disruption  of  communication  for 
public  safety.  The  Federal  Communications  Commission  has  allocated  certain  fre-
quencies  to  public  safety,  but  these  allocations  are  fragmented,  creating  challenges 
for  communications  among  different  agencies  and  jurisdictions.  In  the  Intelligence 
Reform and Terrorism Prevention Act of 2004, Congress required the Federal Com-
munications  Commission  (FCC)  in  consultation  with  DHS  and  the  National  Tele-
communications  and  Information  Administration  (NTIA)  to  conduct  a  study  to  as-
sess  the  spectrum  needs  for  local,  state,  and  Federal  first  responders,  which  is  due 
in  December  2005.  SAFECOM  is  currently  assessing  public  safety  spectrum  needs 
in support of the President’s national spectrum management initiative. DHS, in con-
sultation  with  the  Department  of  Commerce  and  other  relevant  agencies,  is  devel-
oping  a  Spectrum  Needs  Plan  out  of  these  assessments  which  will  be  delivered  to 
the President by the end of November 2005. 
Certification of State Communications Plans 

Interoperability  requires,  before  all  else,  simple  operability—that  is,  communica-
tions  within  the  local  agency.  As  Hurricane  Katrina  demonstrated,  in  the  absence 
of a reliable network across which responders within an agency can effectively com-
municate,  interoperability  is  both  irrelevant  and  impossible.  Strengthening  and  en-
suring  basic  level  public  safety  communications  capabilities,  therefore,  is  the  first 
task.  But  progressing  from  agency-specific  operability  towards  multi-jurisdictional 
and  multi-disciplinary  interoperability  requires  attention  to  more  than  technology. 
Some  believe  the  introduction  of  new  technologies  alone  can  solve  our  interoper-
ability  problems.  But  adding  equipment  addresses  only  one  part  of  what  a  fully  ro-
bust,  reliable,  and  interoperable  public  safety  communications  system  requires. 
With  input  from  the  public  safety  community,  we  have  identified  five  key  building 
blocks  required  to  achieve  interoperability.  Governance,  Standard  Operating  Proce-
dures  (SOP),  Technology,  Training  and  Exercises,  routine  use  (Usage)  of  interoper-
able  systems,  and  regular  Maintenance  must  all  be  present  for  interoperability  to 
be possible. To help public safety agencies and especially the policy levels of govern-
ment  understand  the  interrelationship  of  all  of  these  factors,  we  developed  a  tool 
called  the  ‘‘Interoperability  Continuum.’’  This  planning  tool  explains  how  all  these 
elements  relate  to  each  other.  For  example,  if  a  city  within  a  region  procures  new 
equipment it may have a technical interoperability capability, but unless it has also 
conducted  exercises  to  test  procedures  (and  find  points  of  failure)  and  concepts  of 
operation,  and  developed  policies  agreeable  to  the  entire  region,  it  is  unlikely  the 
new equipment can be effectively integrated into regional interoperability plans. As 
states develop their emergency communications plans, we recommend that they ad-
dress all the elements of the Interoperability Continuum. 
Statewide Planning Tools 

Statewide communications plans are often unsuccessful because the top-down ap-
proach  fails  to  consider  the  requirements  of  the  first  responders  who  are  the  pri-
mary users and who control the most of the wireless infrastructure. 

In  2004,  SAFECOM  partnered  with  the  Commonwealth  of  Virginia  and  the  De-
partment  of  Justice  to  develop  a  strategic  plan  for  improving  statewide  interoper-
able  communications  for  the  state.  The  effort  was  based  on  SAFECOM’s  ‘‘bottom- 
up,’’ locally-driven approach. The planning process included six regional focus group 
sessions,  which  culminated  in  a  final  strategic  planning  session.  The  focus  group 
sessions  captured  perspectives  from  numerous  local  public  safety  representatives 
throughout  the  Commonwealth;  these  perspectives  were  used  in  the  final  strategic 
planning  session  in  which  recommendations  for  key  initiatives  were  developed  as 
part  of  a  statewide  strategic  plan  for  improving  public  safety  communications  and 
interoperability. 

Based  on  lessons  learned  from  the  Virginia  planning  process,  SAFECOM  pub-
lished the Statewide Communications Interoperability Planning (SCIP) Methodology 
as  a  model  for  integrating  practitioner  input  into  a  successful  statewide  strategic 
plan to every state. The SCIP Methodology serves as one approach for states to con-
sider as they initiate statewide communications planning efforts. 

We are also implementing Section 7304 of the Intelligence Reform and Terrorism 
Prevention  Act  of  2004  (Public  Law  108–458),  which  authorized  the  Secretary  of 
Homeland  Security  to  carry  out  at  least  two  Regional  Communications  Interoper-
ability  Pilots  (RCIP).  In  accordance  with  the  Congressional  criteria  for  determining 
the  location  of  the  pilot  sites,  as  well  as  criteria  outlined  by  the  program  itself, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

SAFECOM  selected  the  State  of  Nevada  and  the  Commonwealth  of  Kentucky  as 
RCIP locations. SAFECOM, in coordination with the Office of State and Local Gov-
ernment  Coordination  and  Preparedness’  Interoperable  Communications  Technical 
Assistance  Program  (ICTAP),  is  helping  both  states  implement  the  SCIP  method-
ology. 

Building  on  lessons  learned  from  the  SCIP  Methodology  and  earlier  SAFECOM 
initiatives, the RCIP projects will help us identify models for improving communica-
tions and interoperability that take into account the wide range of challenges across 
the  nation.  When  the  projects  are  complete,  Nevada  and  Kentucky  will  each  have 
improved  interoperability  plans  and  we  will  be  able  to  use  the  lessons  learned  to 
better  develop  or  strengthen  replicable  tools  and  methodologies  which  will  be  made 
available  to  public  safety  practitioners,  as  well  as  to  local  and  state  governments. 
An  interim  report  regarding  the  progress  of  the  pilot  projects  has  been  submitted 
to Congress. A final report will be provided to Congress in June 2006. 

We believe statewide emergency communications plans are fundamental to an ef-
fective  response  to  a  catastrophic  event.  As  states  continue  to  develop  their  own 
plans,  SAFECOM  recommends  that  they  do  so  in  coordination  with  SAFECOM 
methodologies and guidance. 
RapidCom 

On  July  22,  2004,  President  Bush  formally  announced  the  RapidCom  initiative, 
a program designed to ensure that a minimum level of public safety interoperability 
would be in place in ten high-threat urban areas by September 30, 2004. 

In  coordination  with  the  Office  of  State  and  Local  Government  Coordination  and 
Preparedness  (OSLGCP),  the  Department  of  Justice’s  25  Cities  Program,  and  the 
DHS  Wireless  Management  Office,  SAFECOM  worked  closely  with  public  safety 
leaders  in  ten  high-risk  urban  areas  centered  in  Boston,  Chicago,  Houston,  Jersey 
City,  Los  Angeles,  Miami,  New  York,  Philadelphia,  San  Francisco,  and  the  Wash-
ington  Metropolitan  Area  to  assess  their  communications  interoperability  capacity 
and needs, and to identify and implement solutions. In keeping with the SAFECOM 
‘‘bottom-up’’  approach,  local  officials  drove  the  design  and  implementation  of  solu-
tions in their jurisdictions. 

With  the  on-time  completion  of  the  RapidCom  project,  incident  commanders  in 
each  of  the  urban  areas  now  have  confirmed  they  have  the  ability  to  adequately 
communicate with each other and their respective command centers within one hour 
of an incident. 
Interoperable Communications Technical Assistance Program (ICTAP) 

A key component in achieving interoperable communications across the Nation is 
providing  on-site  technical  assistance  to  states  and  urban  areas.  SLGCP  funds 
ICTAP,  a  technical  assistance  program  designed  to  enhance  interoperable  commu-
nications  between  local,  state,  and  Federal  first  responders  and  public  safety  offi-
cials.  The  program  provides  free  support  to  states  and  urban  areas  with  the  goal 
of  enabling  local  public  safety  officials  to  communicate  across  disciplines  and  juris-
dictions  via  radio  communications  systems,  exchanging  voice  and/or  data  with  one 
another on demand, in real time, as authorized. 
Conclusion 

These  initiatives  are  only  part  of  what  the  SAFECOM  program  has  undertaken 
to advance communications interoperability across the Nation. This Nation is heav-
ily  invested  in  an  existing  infrastructure  that  is  too  often  inadequate  to  the  basic 
communications  requirements  of  individual  agencies  and  not  interoperable.  We 
must continue to pursue a comprehensive strategy that takes into account technical 
and cultural issues associated with improving interoperability, which recognizes the 
challenges  associated  with  incorporating  legacy  equipment  and  practices  in  con-
stantly changing technology and cultural environments, and which ensures that the 
needs of the frontline of emergency response—the first responders—are met. Though 
many challenges remain, we believe we have accomplished a great deal in the short 
time DHS has managed this program. 

We  are  confident  that  with  your  continuing  support  and  the  assistance  of  our 
many  Federal  partners,  we  will  continue  to  move  towards  a  world  where  lives  and 
property  are  never  lost  because  public  safety  agencies  are  unable  to  communicate 
or lack compatible equipment and training resources. 

APPENDIX I: OIC AUTHORITIES FROM THE INTELLIGENCE REFORM AND TERRORISM 

PREVENTION ACT OF 2004 

Congress,  with  the  passage  of  the  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention 
Act of 2004 (Pub. L. 108–458) less than a year ago, gave OIC and SAFECOM legis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

lative authority to carry out its responsibilities. Before passage of this Act, responsi-
bility for addressing interoperability was spread across three different agencies. Sec-
tion 7303 of the Act directed SAFECOM to: 

munications; 

tions to public safety interoperable communications; 

approach to achieving public safety interoperable communications; 

• coordinate  with  other  Federal  agencies  to  establish  a  comprehensive  national 
• develop,  with  Federal  agencies  and  state  and  local  authorities,  minimum  capa-
bilities  for  communications  interoperability  for  Federal,  state,  and  local  public 
safety agencies; 
• accelerate  voluntary  consensus  standards  for  public  safety  interoperable  com-
• develop and implement flexible open architectures for short- and long-term solu-
• identify  priorities  for  research,  development,  and  testing  and  evaluation  within 
DHS and assist other Federal agencies in doing the same with regard to public 
safety interoperable communications; 
• provide  technical  assistance  to  state  and  localities  regarding  planning,  acquisi-
tion  strategies,  and  other  functions  necessary  to  achieve  public  safety  commu-
nications interoperability; 
• develop and disseminate best practices to improve public safety communications 
• develop  appropriate  performance  measures  and  milestones  to  measure  the  Na-
• provide  technical  guidance,  training,  and  other  assistance  to  support  the  rapid 
establishment  of  consistent,  secure,  and  effective  interoperable  communications 
capabilities  in  the  event  of  an  emergency  in  urban  and  other  areas  determined 
by  the  Secretary  to  be  at  consistently  high  levels  of  risk  from  terrorist  attack; 
and 
• develop  minimum  interoperable  communications  capabilities  for  emergency  re-

tion’s progress to achieving public safety communications interoperability; 

interoperability; 

sponse providers. 

APPENDIX II: TOOLS AND METHODS BASED ON LOCAL AND STATE PILOTS 

Communications  Tabletop  Exercise  Methodology,  a  process  for  a  communications- 

focused tabletop exercise replicable across urban areas. 

Tabletop  Exercise  After-Action  Report,  a  template  for  capturing  key  findings  and 

identifying gaps following each tabletop exercise. 

Interoperability  Pocket  Guide,  a  process  for  creating  an  area-specific  interoper-
ability pocket guide to ensure local public safety officials are aware of current capa-
bilities available in their areas. 

Templates  for  Improving  Interoperability,  including  governance  charter,  standard 
operating  procedure  (SOP),  and  memorandum  of  agreement  (MOA)  templates  to 
help communities improve interoperability. 

Operational  Guide  for  the  Interoperability  Continuum—Lessons  Learned  from 
RapidCom,  which  outlines  the  importance  of  each  element  of  the  Interoperability 
Continuum,  provides  common  challenges  to  consider  when  working  towards  im-
proved  interoperability,  and  recommends  key  actions  to  increase  an  area’s  capabili-
ties. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Chief  Carter,  Association  of  Public–Safety  Communications  Offi-
cials International, and Chief of Communications, Shreveport, Lou-
isiana, Fire Department. Thank you for coming. 

STATEMENT OF WILLIS CARTER, FIRST VICE PRESIDENT, 

ASSOCIATION OF PUBLIC–SAFETY COMMUNICATIONS 

OFFICIALS, INTERNATIONAL (APCO); CHIEF OF 

COMMUNICATIONS, SHREVEPORT FIRE DEPARTMENT 

Mr.  CARTER.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens  and  Members  of  the 

Committee, for the opportunity to appear before you here today. 

My name is Willis Carter. I’m the First Vice President of APCO, 
the Association of Public-Safety Communications Officials. I’m also 
Chief  of  Communications  for  the  Shreveport,  Louisiana,  Fire  De-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

partment.  In  addition  to  appearing  on  behalf  of  APCO,  I  note  that 
the  following  national  organizations  have  indicated  their  support 
for  my  testimony  here  today:  The  International  Association  of 
Chiefs  of  Police,  the  International  Association  of  Fire  Chiefs,  the 
National  Association  of  Counties,  the  National  Leagues  of  Cities, 
and the Congressional Fire Services Institute. 

We are very pleased that Congress is considering how it can pro-
mote  public  safety  communications.  Recent  events  have  dem-
onstrated  the  importance  of  incident  command  and  control,  which 
obviously requires effective and efficient communications. We want 
to emphasize that communications solutions need to focus not only 
on  major  disasters,  such  as  Katrina  and  9/11,  but  also  on  the  day- 
to-day  communications  requirements  of  public  safety  agencies.  We 
must also work to identify the real problems and develop carefully 
planned  approaches  to  solve  those  problems.  This  is  no  time  to 
throw  money  at  ill-conceived  Band–Aid  solutions.  We  also  caution 
that solutions not be thrust upon state and local governments with-
out consideration of cost. 

There  are  three  broad  areas  where  assistance  is  needed.  First, 
planning,  coordination,  and  training.  Second,  sufficient  radio  spec-
trum  for  robust  interoperable  radio  communications.  And  third, 
funding  to  help  state  and  local  government  agencies  acquire  the 
skills  and  the  equipment  they  need  to  provide  the  best-possible 
communications capability. 

My hometown of Shreveport, which is in northwest Louisiana, es-
caped  the  wrath  of  Katrina.  However,  this  past  weekend,  we  did 
have serious wind damage and extensive power outages, thanks to 
Hurricane  Rita.  Throughout  both  hurricanes,  our  communications 
system,  which  has  interoperability  with  some  50  agencies,  worked 
extremely well. Of course, other areas in the Gulf Coast region saw 
much  more  devastation  and  experienced  more  serious  communica-
tions problems. 

Shortly  after  Hurricane  Katrina,  I  had  the  opportunity  to  go  on 
a  fact-finding  mission  to  many  of  the  affected  areas.  And  this  is 
more  fully  described  in  my  written  statement.  I  saw  devastation 
and despair in every direction. I also saw the same basic problems 
in  all  areas:  lack  of  coordinated  incident  command,  lack  of  direct 
support  for  communications  centers  and  their  personnel,  and  the 
inability to communicate. 

The damage caused by Hurricane Katrina either destroyed or se-
riously  damaged  many  public  safety  communications  facilities. 
Typically,  public  safety  systems  are  designed  to  withstand  the 
worst that nature or man can offer. And it’s very unusual for public 
safety  systems  to  fail,  even  after  commercial  systems  go  down. 
Katrina  was  a  real  exception  to  that.  Nevertheless,  Katrina  is  a 
warning  that  public  safety  systems  need  to  take  all  reasonable 
steps to ensure survivability. 

A  lack  of  interoperability  was  a  major  problem  both  during  and 
following Katrina. However, the breakdown of basic operability was 
also  a  serious  concern.  First  responders  could  not  communicate,  in 
many  cases,  with  their  own  agencies,  let  alone  personnel  from 
other jurisdictions. 

Maintaining  operability  and  achieving  interoperability  are  com-
plex  tasks,  with  no  single  answer  for  all  public  safety  agencies  or 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

regions. Possible solutions to this problem can include better train-
ing—better  planning  and  training,  compatible  radio  equipment, 
patches  to  tie  radio  networks  together,  radio  systems  that  operate 
in  the  same  radio  frequency  band,  more  spectrum  for  interoper-
ability channels, and, in some cases, all of the above. 

One of the most important steps that Congress can take is to es-
tablish an early and firm date for the clearing of TV stations from 
the 700 MHz band. That, in turn, will free up spectrum which was 
allocated for public safety use back in 1998. 

My written statement spells out some of the benefits of this spec-
trum.  However,  to  summarize,  the  spectrum  will  help  to  alleviate 
serious congestion on many existing public safety radio systems. It 
will provide capacity for new communications tools. And it will pro-
mote  enhanced  interoperability,  both  on  a  daily  basis  and  during 
major emergencies. 

Congress  can  also  assist  by  providing  funding  to  support  train-
ing, planning, and coordination. Funding is also needed to enhance 
communications system survivability, and help state and local gov-
ernments  acquire  new  equipment  for  robust  interoperable  commu-
nications systems. 

Mr. Chairman, just as September 11, 2001 helped us to focus the 
Nation  on  the  communications  issues  facing  our  first  responders, 
Hurricane Katrina has revealed that much still needs to be accom-
plished  in  order  to  provide  the  public  safety  personnel  with  the 
tools  that  they  need  to  protect  the  safety  of  life  and  property.  We 
look  forward  to  working  with  the  Congress  and  other  parties  to-
ward this crucial effort. 

Thank  you,  once  again,  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you 

today. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carter follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIS CARTER,  FIRST VICE PRESIDENT,  ASSOCIATION OF 
PUBLIC-SAFETY COMMUNICATIONS OFFICIALS,  INTERNATIONAL (APCO);  CHIEF OF 
COMMUNICATIONS, SHREVEPORT FIRE DEPARTMENT 
Thank  you  Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today,  and  for  your  long-standing 
interest in the communications issues facing our Nation’s first responders. 

My  name  is  Willis  Carter  and  I  am  the  First  Vice  President  of  APCO  Inter-
national, the Association of Public-Safety Communications Officials. I am also Chief 
of  Communications  for  the  Shreveport,  Louisiana  Fire  Department.  I  have  served 
a total of 34 years with the Department, the last 20 of which have been in my cur-
rent position. In addition to appearing on behalf of APCO International, I note that 
the  following  national  organizations  have  indicated  their  support  for  my  testimony 
here  today  and  have  requested  that  their  support  be  noted  in  the  record:  Inter-
national Association of Chiefs of Police, International Association of Fire Chiefs, Na-
tional  Association  of  Counties,  National  Leagues  of  Cities,  and  the  Congressional 
Fire Services Institute. 

APCO  International  is  the  Nation’s  oldest  and  largest  public  safety  communica-
tions  organization,  with  over  14,000  individual  members  who  manage  and  operate 
communications  systems  and  facilities  for  police,  fire,  emergency  medical  and  other 
state and local government public safety agencies. 

APCO  International  has  been  very  active  in  helping  to  respond  to  Hurricane 
Katrina  and  its  aftermath.  We  have  been  working  closely  with  the  public  safety 
agencies  in  the  affected  areas,  first,  to  provide  whatever  assistance  we  can  to  the 
individuals and agencies involved, and second, to gather information so that we may 
learn  from  this  disaster  and  be  better  prepared  in  the  future.  Through  a  variety  of 
mechanisms, our members from across the Nation have also been coming to the aid 
of their colleagues in the hardest hit areas, providing both professional and personal 
assistance whenever possible. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

Through  its  role  as  a  FCC-certified  frequency  coordinator,  APCO  International 
has  helped  to  secure  radio  communications  frequencies  for  emergency  response 
agencies  in  the  affected  areas,  and  to  assist  agencies  that  must  repair  or  replace 
damaged  facilities.  I  note  that  APCO  International  has  done  so  while  waiving  its 
normal frequency coordination fees. 

Fortunately,  my  hometown  of  Shreveport,  which  is  in  northwest  Louisiana,  es-
caped  the  wrath  of  Katrina.  We  were  not  so  lucky  with  Hurricane  Rita,  which  did 
cause  some  damage  and  significant  power  outages  in  the  Shreveport  area.  I  am 
pleased  to  report  that  our  public  safety  communications  system  in  Shreveport 
worked  very  well  after  both  of  the  recent  hurricanes.  However,  as  we  all  know, 
there  were  serious  communications  problems  in  many  of  the  areas  that  were  more 
directly affected by Hurricane Katrina. 

Shortly after Katrina struck, I had the opportunity to go on a fact-finding mission 
to  many  of  the  affected  areas.  I  have  also  had  extensive  communication  with  my 
colleagues  from  other  public  safety  agencies  throughout  Louisiana.  My  statement 
today  will  summarize  some  of  my  observations,  offer  other  information  that  APCO 
International  has  gathered,  and  present  some  general  concerns  that  APCO  Inter-
national has as we move forward to improve public safety communications capabili-
ties.  I  want  to  emphasize  that  our  solutions  need  to  focus  not  just  on  major  disas-
ters,  such  as  Hurricane  Katrina  and  9/11,  but  also  on  the  day-to-day  communica-
tions requirements of public safety agencies. We must also work to identify the real 
problems and develop carefully planned approaches to solve those problems. This is 
no time to throw money at ill-conceived ‘‘band-aid’’ solutions. I also caution that so-
lutions  not  be  thrust  upon  state  and  local  governments  without  consideration  of 
cost. 

On  Monday  September  5,  I  traveled  to  St.  Tammany  Parish,  which  is  located  on 
the  north  side  of  Lake  Pontchartrain.  There  I  toured  seven  dispatch  centers.  The 
devastation  that  I  witnessed  was  unimaginable.  Public  safety  call  takers  and  dis-
patchers operating at Public Safety Answering Points, or PSAPs, were working and 
living  in  their  communications  centers.  Some  had  lost  their  homes,  and  most  had 
suffered  significant  damage,  but  all  were  on  the  job  and  still  attempting  to  provide 
help  and  assistance  to  the  thousands  of  citizens  in  need.  Communications  capabili-
ties  were  at  best  very  limited.  The  primary  tower  site  which  supports  the  City  of 
Slidell  radio  system  had  been  damaged,  but  was  still  affording  limited  service.  The 
entire  area  of  Slidell,  Louisiana  was  without  power  and  relying  on  emergency 
backup power sources. The Covington area had some power restored. 9–1–1 was to-
tally out of service. 

I  departed  St.  Tammany  Parish  on  Tuesday,  and  traveled  to  St.  Charles  Parish, 
which  is  adjacent  to  Jefferson  Parish  and  on  the  west  side  of  New  Orleans  proper. 
This  area  did  not  endure  the  direct  blunt  of  the  storm,  and  although  sustaining 
somewhat less damage than what I had seen the day before, they were nonetheless 
facing  significant  challenges  with  limited  radio  communications,  and  a  total  outage 
of  9–1–1.  I  was  to  find  that  the  worst  was  yet  to  come.  The  Jefferson  Parish  Com-
munications  Center  was  in  much  more  dire  circumstances.  Communication  to  field 
units was very limited, access to 9–1–1 was completely out, and the call takers and 
dispatchers were experiencing the impact of the stress of working, sleeping, and eat-
ing in their dispatch center since the storm hit five days earlier. The Fire Dispatch 
Commander  told  me  that  he  had  lost  five  dispatch  personnel  since  the  storm  due 
to  the  fact  that  the  stress  associated  with  this  tragic  event  had  prompted  them  to 
simply walk out. My attempts to reach the New Orleans Police dispatch center and 
the New Orleans Fire dispatch center were unsuccessful. Flooding prevented access 
to either of these centers which had both been evacuated. There was no 9–1–1 serv-
ice,  and  the  majority  of  public  safety  radio  communications  were  not  functioning. 
As has been reported elsewhere, a major communications problem occurred when 
the  New  Orleans  800  MHz  radio  system  went  down,  and  repairs  were  delayed  for 
several  days.  My  understanding  is  that  the  system  would  normally  have  provided 
a  mutual  aid  backbone  for  surrounding  jurisdictions  and  linkage  to  the  Louisiana 
state  radio  system  (which  also  suffered  some  damage  in  the  area).  Aside  from  the 
impact  of  the  New  Orleans  radio  system,  the  relief  efforts  were  plagued  in  many 
areas  by  a  lack  of  interoperability  between  radio  equipment  used  by  various  first 
responders. 

My  department  in  Shreveport  operates  on  an  800  MHz  system  that  services  all 
police,  fire,  EMS  and  other  agencies  in  Caddo  Parish,  and  provides  good  interoper-
ability  on  a  daily  basis  within  the  region.  However,  when  members  of  my  depart-
ment were detailed to the New Orleans area, they were unable to operate our radios 
on the Louisiana State 800 MHz network due to software incompatibility. This prob-
lem can be fixed, for about $800 per radio, but requires funding from State or Fed-
eral sources. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Another problem that I was told about involved a local agency in the New Orleans 
area  that  actually  disconnected  equipment  designed  to  patch  its  system  with  an-
other in the area, as they were fearful of system overloads. 

In all, I visited four parishes and had the opportunity to visit a total of nine com-
munications  centers.  I  saw  devastation  and  despair  in  every  direction,  and  I  also 
saw  the  same  basic  problems  in  all  areas.  Lack  of  coordinated  incident  command 
and  control,  lack  of  direct  support  for  communications  centers  and  their  personnel, 
and the inability to communicate were obvious problems in every area that I visited. 
There  were  several  factors  that  contributed  to  the  public  safety  communications 
outages in all of these areas. The damage caused by the hurricane winds either de-
stroyed or seriously damaged many primary tower and transmitter sites. The ensu-
ing power outage which engulfed the area required the use of emergency power gen-
erators,  many  of  which  had  been  damaged  or  destroyed  by  flying  debris  and  rising 
water.  Many  of  those  that  remained  in  operation  were  faced  with  exhausted  fuel 
supply  either  by  disruption  of  natural  gas  supply  lines,  or  the  fact  that  there  was 
no  way  to  get  diesel  fuel  into  them  as  the  result  of  flooding.  Some  communications 
sites were simply swallowed up by the floodwaters. Bell South central offices, which 
served  as  9–1–1  tandems,  were  flooded,  which  created  outages  of  9–1–1  service  in 
as many as 13 parishes. 

My experiences in the affected areas reflect just some of the communications prob-
lems  that  became  evident  in  the  wake  of  Katrina.  Based  upon  what  we  know  of 
those  problems,  and  of  our  knowledge  of  emergency  communications  needs  in  gen-
eral, we would like to offer the following recommendations: 

• Significant improvements in local, regional, and national interoperability are es-

sential. 

As noted above, interoperability was a major issue in the response to Katrina, just 
as  it  was  in  responses  to  other  major  emergencies,  and  as  it  is  a  on  a  daily  basis 
across  the  Nation.  Note,  however,  that  for  Katrina,  interoperability  problems  were 
masked  to  some  degree  by  the  larger  and  in  many  ways  more  serious  breakdown 
of  ‘‘operability’’  that  occurred  due  to  the  destruction  of  facilities  or  power  outages. 
First  responders  could  not  communicate  in  many  cases  within  their  own  agencies, 
let alone with personnel from other jurisdictions. 

It  is  also  important  to  understand  that  achieving  interoperability  is  complex, 
without  simple  solutions.  Sometimes  the  need  is  for  better  planning  and  training; 
sometimes  the  need  is  for  compatible  radio  equipment;  sometimes  the  need  is  for 
‘‘patches’’  to  tie  together  radio  networks;  sometimes  the  need  is  for  radio  systems 
to  operate  in  the  same  radio  frequency  band;  sometimes  the  need  is  for  more  spec-
trum for interoperability channels; and sometimes it is all of the above. 

There  also  needs  to  be  a  recognition  that  there  are  different  types  of  interoper-
ability:  for  day-to-day  local  and  ‘‘regional’’  incidents  that  require  multi-agency  re-
sponses,  and  for  major  emergencies  (such  as  Katrina)  where  emergency  responders 
may  be  from  far  and  wide.  The  specific  solutions  vary,  and  must  be  carefully 
planned  and  tailored  to  each  situation.  As  discussed  below,  one  key  element  of  the 
‘‘solution’’ is the nationwide clearing of the 700 MHz band. 

In  his  testimony  last  week,  FCC  Chairman  Martin  mentioned  the  potential  for 
‘‘smart’’  radios  that  can  operate  on  different  frequency  bands.  We  agree  that  such 
technology  should  be  encouraged  as  part  of  the  long-term  solution  for  interoper-
ability. However, we caution that such technology, at least for portable units, is still 
in  development,  and  probably  a  long  way  from  being  available  at  affordable  costs. 
For the foreseeable future, we need interoperability solutions that take into consid-
eration the enormous imbedded base of public safety equipment, currently available 
technologies, and the limited budgets of state and local governments. 

Finally,  on  the  interoperability  issue,  I  want  to  note  our  strong  support  for  the 
DHS  SAFECOM  Program.  SAFECOM  is  doing  very  important  and  useful  work  to 
address  interoperability,  and  it  deserves  the  continued  support  of  Congress.  Impor-
tantly,  SAFECOM  has  incorporated  state  and  local  government  organizations  and 
public  safety  practitioners  into  the  process,  rather  than  relying  on  a  top-down  ap-
proach that ignores the real-life needs and concerns of first responders. 

• Planning and training for disasters are essential, and plans need to be properly 

executed when disasters strike. 

Katrina and its aftermath showed us once again that disaster response efforts, in-
cluding  communications  capabilities,  must  be  planned  well  in  advance.  Equally  im-
portant,  relevant  personnel  need  to  be  trained  and  prepared  to  implement  disaster 
plans. Funding needs to be made available specifically for such planning and train-
ing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

• There  must  be  common  incident  command  structures  at  all  levels  of  the  emer-

gency response effort. 

I saw firsthand the widely-reported breakdowns in emergency response command 
structures. Tragically, far too many personnel who were ready and equipped to lend 
assistance were left without adequate direction, communication, or information. 

• Funding  must  be  available  to  ensure  that  public  safety  communications  net-
works  are  built  and  maintained  to  withstand  worse-case  scenarios.  Plans  and 
funds  must  also  be  in  place  to  restore  facilities  that,  despite  best  efforts,  are 
disrupted. 

Typically,  public  safety  systems  are  designed  to  withstand  the  worst  that  nature 
or man can offer, and it is very unusual for public safety systems to fail, even after 
commercial  communications  networks  go  down.  Katrina  was  a  rare  exception.  At 
present, we do not know the degree to which the system outages caused by Katrina 
could have been avoided. Nevertheless, Katrina is a warning that public safety sys-
tems  need  to  take  all  reasonable  steps  to  ensure  survivability.  That  will  require 
funding and other assistance from Federal, State, and local governments. 

Last week’s hearing also included discussion of using satellite technology in emer-
gency  relief  efforts  when  existing  networks  fail.  We  agree  that  satellites  can  and 
should be part of the solution, especially as alternative means of interconnecting to 
the  national  telephone  network.  However,  we  do  not  see  satellite  service  as  a  re-
placement  for  terrestrial  mobile  radio  networks.  Satellite  phones  are  limited  by 
power issues and, more importantly, generally do not work inside of buildings. 

• There must be a ‘‘hard date’’ for nationwide public safety access to the 700 MHz 

band, which is now blocked in many areas by analog television stations. 

An early ‘‘hard date,’’ as close to the end of 2006 as possible, is essential for public 
safety  agencies  to  be  able  to  plan  for  and  fund  new  radio  systems  using  the  700 
MHz  band.  Portions  of  that  spectrum  were  allocated  for  public  safety  in  1998,  but 
remain blocked by incumbent television stations. Mr. Chairman, this committee has 
already  spent  considerable  time  on  this  issue  and  the  related  transition  to  digital 
television.  However,  I  would  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to  emphasize  briefly  why 
this spectrum is so important for public safety. 

The  public  safety  spectrum  in  the  700  MHz  band  would  help  to  alleviate  serious 
congestion on many existing public safety radio systems, especially in major metro-
politan  areas.  Many  current  public  safety  systems  operate  with  too  few  channels 
and insufficient capacity. That congestion can endanger the lives of first responders 
and the public, and it prevents deployment of new communications tools. 

The  700  MHz  band  will  also  facilitate  interoperability,  both  on  a  daily  basis  and 
for  major  emergencies.  The  band  is  adjacent  to  the  existing  800  MHz  public  safety 
band, and will allow for relatively easy interoperability between the two bands (700/ 
800 MHz equipment is already available in the marketplace). The new public safety 
spectrum  will  also  allow  for  new  and  expanded  multi-agency,  multi-jurisdictional 
radio systems, which is perhaps the best long-term solution for interoperability. Fi-
nally,  the  FCC  rules  set  aside  2.6  MHz  of  spectrum  within  the  700  MHz  band  for 
dedicated  national  interoperability  channels,  with  a  requirement  that  all  700  MHz 
radio equipment be programmed to operate on these channels pursuant to a digital 
interoperability standard. 

Once  the  Congress  fixes  a  hard  date,  agencies  will  be  able  to  move  forward  to 
plan, fund and construct radio systems in the 700 MHz band. The FCC has already 
established  rules  for  the  new  spectrum,  state  governments  have  already  received 
state-wide  licenses,  some  equipment  is  already  available  (and  other  equipment  will 
be,  once  manufacturers  have  the  certainty  needed  to  justify  R&D),  and  regional 
planning is well underway. For some existing 800 MHz systems, the 700 MHz chan-
nels  will  also  provide  opportunities  for  rapid  expansion  without  the  need  to  build 
new systems. 

As  a  footnote,  Louisiana  is  exploring  whether  700  MHz  channels  and  equipment 
could  be  a  key  element  of  a  new  radio  system  for  the  area.  Fortunately,  the  700 
MHz public safety channels are not blocked by TV stations in Louisiana. The same 
cannot be said for most metropolitan areas of the country. 

• There  is  a  need  for  additional  700  MHz  band  spectrum  for  mobile  broadband 
operations to provide high speed video and data to and among public safety per-
sonnel and agencies in the field. 

Last year, Congress instructed DHS and the FCC to study this issue, and a report 

is due in December. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

• Additional funding is needed to assist public safety agencies in their acquisition 

of state-of-the-art interoperable communications equipment. 

Many agencies need assistance to implement both short-term and long-term inter-
operable  solutions.  One  small  example  is  the  software  upgrades  needed  for  my  de-
partment’s  radios  to  operate  on  the  state-wide  radio  network.  Funding  should  also 
include training and staffing. 

• PSAPs and other emergency communications centers must be considered as core 
elements  of  the  first  response  structure,  and  the  staff  of  those  facilities  needs 
the support of all levels of government. 

Much  attention  has  properly  been  focused  on  the  brave  first  responders  on  the 
streets  of  the  affected  areas,  who  have  worked  hard  to  save  lives  and  address  the 
turmoil  and  destruction  created  by  Hurricane  Katrina.  Unfortunately,  not  enough 
attention  has  been  placed  on  the  equally  brave  and  committed  personnel  who  re-
ceive  9–1–1  calls,  dispatch  emergency  personnel,  and  manage  communications  cen-
ters under enormous pressures. They too need our support. 

• Telephone central offices supporting 9–1–1 tandems must be ‘‘mirrored’’ in loca-

tions sufficiently remote to allow for quick restoration of 9–1–1 services. 

As  I  noted  above,  as  many  as  thirteen  PSAPs  may  have  been  disrupted  largely 

because the relevant Bell South central stations were flooded. 

• Congress  should  provide  funds  to  assist  PSAPs  in  their  upgrades  for  wireless 

E9–1–1 and other technologies. 

We  urge  Congress  to  go  beyond  merely  funding  a  program  office.  Significant  and 
meaningful  grant  funds  should  also  be  made  available.  We  also  note  that  sugges-
tions  that  PSAPs  move  towards  IP-based  technologies  often  ignore  the  huge  cost 
that would be imposed upon cash-strapped state and local governments. 

Mr. Chairman, just as September 11, 2001, helped to focus the Nation on the com-
munications issues facing our first responders, Hurricane Katrina has revealed that 
much still needs to be accomplished to provide public safety personnel with the com-
munications  tools  they  need  to  protect  the  safety  of  life  and  property.  We  look  for-
ward  to  working  with  the  Congress,  the  FCC,  and  other  parties  in  this  critical  ef-
fort. 

Thank you once again for the opportunity to appear before you today. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Chief. 
Our  next  witness  is  Dereck  Orr,  Project  Manager  of  the  Public 
Safety Communications, National Institute of Standards and Tech-
nology. 

Mr. Orr? 

STATEMENT  OF  DERECK  ORR,  PROGRAM  MANAGER,  PUBLIC 
SAFETY  COMMUNICATIONS  SYSTEMS,  NATIONAL  INSTITUTE 
OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY (NIST) 
Mr. ORR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I was fortunate to have had the great privilege to serve the Sen-
ate  as  a  professional  staff  member  of  the  Appropriations  Com-
mittee under Senator Fritz Hollings. I am, therefore, sincerely hon-
ored to again be able to be here this morning with you and the es-
teemed members of this committee. 

NIST’s  Public  Safety  Communications  Program  serves  as  the 
technical  lead  for  several  of  the  Administration’s  initiatives  focus-
ing on communications, most importantly, the SAFECOM program 
led by Dr. Boyd. Although NIST is helping to improve public safety 
communications  through  a  number  of  efforts,  many  of  which  Dr. 
Boyd spoke of, I will focus the remainder of my remarks this morn-
ing on the state of standards for public safety communications sys-
tems. 

Interoperability  for  public  safety  communications  is  defined  as 
the ability to share information via voice, data, on-demand, in real 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

time,  when  needed,  and  as  authorized.  The  public  safety  commu-
nity  expects  that  this  level  of  interoperability  will  be  available 
using  equipment  from  multiple  manufacturers,  be  transparent  to 
the  user,  require  little  or  no  special  knowledge  of  the  system,  and 
not  be  dependent  on  common  frequency  assignments.  Obviously, 
this  is  not  what  we  have  today.  And,  achieving  this  definition  of 
interoperability in the future will not be possible without the exist-
ence of standards. 

Of course, public safety radio users have recognized this for some 
time.  Approximately  15  years  ago,  representatives  from  local, 
State,  and  Federal  public  safety  associations  and  agencies  joined 
together  to  address  the  absence  of  available  standards.  They  did 
this for two primary purposes. First, was to ensure that interoper-
ability could be achieved assuming the use of equipment from mul-
tiple  manufacturers.  Second,  through  standards,  the  public  safety 
community  wanted  to  be  able  to  take  advantage  of  cost  reductions 
associated with the more competitive land mobile radio market. 

The  public  safety  community  partnered  with  the  Telecommuni-
cations Industry Association (TIA) to serve as the standards devel-
opment  organization  for  this  effort.  Thus,  Project  25,  or  P–25,  as 
we know it today, was launched. 

A commonly misunderstood aspect of P–25 is that it is comprised 
of a single standard. Instead, it is a suite of standards that specify 
the eight interfaces between the various components of a land mo-
bile radio system. 

Over the last 15 years, only one of the P–25 interfaces, the Com-
mon  Air  Interface  that  deals  with  the  functions  of  the  handheld 
units, has been advanced to a level where it would help satisfy the 
goals  of  P–25.  But,  it  alone,  cannot  provide  the  level  of  interoper-
ability  public  safety  is  calling  for.  The  remainder  of  the  interfaces 
either  remain  undefined  or  lack  enough  specificity  to  allow  for  a 
common  implementation  of  the  interface;  and,  therefore,  remain 
proprietary. 

An  MOU  formalizing  the  relationship  between  the  public  safety 
users and TIA created a steering committee comprised only of pub-
lic  safety  and  government  representatives,  and  invested  that  com-
mittee  with  the  sole  authority  to  designate  a  P–25  standard,  and 
did  not  limit  it  to  only  TIA-adopted  standards.  This  is  important, 
because that gives the control of the process to the radio users, and 
those users have called for immediate results. 

The  Co-Chair  of  the  P–25  steering  committee  recently  informed 
the  membership  of  TIA  that  an  agreed-upon  Inter-RF-Subsystem- 
Interface,  the  ISSI  document  will  be  required  by  January  of  2006. 
The  ISSI  is  extremely  important,  in  that  it  is  the  interface  stand-
ard  that  will  ultimately  allow  P–25  systems  operated  by  different 
public  safety  entities  to  connect  into  one  seamless  network,  when 
necessary.  If  this  January  deadline  is  not  met,  the  steering  com-
mittee  will  vote  to  begin  an  alternate  process  for  developing  an 
ISSI  standard.  The  steering  committee’s  plan  is  to  issue  a  call  for 
proposals to fully define an open ISSI standard, select the best pro-
posal, and designate it as the P–25 standard. 

This  same  option  can  be  exercised  for  all  other  remaining  inter-
faces  as  well,  if  the  steering  committee  is  not  satisfied  with  the 
progress within the TIA process. NIST will continue providing tech-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

nical  and  engineering  support  to  the  steering  committee  so  that  it 
can meet its goals and timelines. 

In  addition,  Mr.  Chairman,  over  the  last  2  years  NIST,  with 
funds  from  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  and  the  Depart-
ment  of  Justice,  has  tested  a  number  of  the  handheld  P–25  radios 
that  claim  to  meet  the  available  Common-Air  Interface  standard. 
Using  the  test  procedures  called  for  in  the  standard,  NIST  found 
that  none  of  the  available  radios  met  all  aspects  of  the  standard. 
Therefore,  NIST,  with  the  support  of  SAFECOM  and  the  P–25 
steering  committee,  is  developing  a  P–25  Conformity  Assessment 
Program.  NIST  is  preparing  and  documenting  standardized  test 
protocols  for  the  most  important  aspects  of  the  Common-Air  Inter-
face  standard.  The  standardized  test  protocols  will  then  be  pro-
vided  to  NIST’s  National  Voluntary  Laboratory  Accreditation  Pro-
gram,  which  can  accredit  third-party  laboratories  across  the  coun-
try interested in offering these testing capabilities. 

These  conformance  tests  would  go  a  long  way  in  assuring  the 
public  safety  community  that  the  equipment  being  purchased 
meets the P–25 standard. 

In  summation,  Mr.  Chairman,  there  are  positive  steps  being 
taken  by  leaders  within  the  public  safety  community,  key  Federal 
programs,  the  Congress,  and  industry  to  significantly  change  the 
current  environment  and  move  the  state  of  standards  for  public 
safety forward. This time next year, there should be newly adopted 
P–25  interface  standards  that  can  be  tied  to  grants  and  procure-
ments, and radio users will have a mechanism in place to begin to 
ensure  that  the  products  they  are  purchasing  truly  do  what  is 
called for in the applicable standard. 

Again, I am honored to be here before this committee today, and 

I will be happy to answer any questions that you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Orr follows:] 

INSTITUTE

OF

STANDARDS

SYSTEMS,  NATIONAL

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DERECK ORR,  PROGRAM MANAGER,  PUBLIC SAFETY 
AND 

COMMUNICATIONS
TECHNOLOGY (NIST) 
Thank you, Chairman Stevens and members of the Committee, I serve as the Pro-
gram Manager for Public Safety Communications Systems in the Office of Law En-
forcement Standards at the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST). 
NIST, a non-regulatory agency within the U.S. Commerce Department’s Technology 
Administration, serves industry, academia, and other parts of the government by de-
veloping  and  promoting  measurements,  standards,  and  technology  to  enhance  pro-
ductivity, facilitate trade, and improve the quality of life. 

NIST’s public safety communications program serves as the technical lead for sev-
eral  Administration  initiatives  focusing  on  communications,  most  importantly,  the 
SAFECOM  Program  led  by  Dr.  Boyd.  NIST  is  involved  in  many  of  the  key 
SAFECOM  initiatives,  including  the  Statement  of  Requirements,  Public  Safety  Ar-
chitecture  Framework,  testing  and  evaluation,  and  standards  development.  The 
strong  partnership  between  SAFECOM  and  NIST  is  an  excellent  example  within 
the Administration of multi-agency coordination and collaboration, and is something 
for which we at NIST are very proud. 

I  will  focus  the  remainder  of  my  remarks  this  morning  on  the  state  of  standards 

for public safety communications systems. 

Interoperability  for  public  safety  communications  is  defined  as  ‘‘the  ability  to 
share information via voice and data signals on demand, in real time, when needed, 
and as authorized.’’ The public safety community expects that this level of interoper-
ability  will  be  available  using  equipment  from  multiple  manufacturers,  that  they 
are  transparent  to  the  user,  requiring  little  or  no  special  knowledge  of  the  system, 
and that they are not dependent on common frequency assignments. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Achieving  this  definition  of  interoperability  is  not  possible  without  the  existence 
of standards that will define how the various components of a public safety commu-
nications system will interoperate, regardless of manufacturer. In fact, I would ven-
ture to say that in the absence of standards, achieving this level of interoperability 
would be impossible. 

Public  safety  users  have  recognized  this  for  some  time.  Approximately  fifteen 
years  ago,  representatives  from  local,  state,  and  Federal  public  safety  associations 
and agencies joined together to address the absence of available standards. They did 
this  for  two  primary  purposes.  First  was  to  ensure  that  interoperability  could  be 
achieved,  assuming  the  use  of  equipment  from  multiple  manufacturers.  Second, 
through  standards,  the  public  safety  community  wanted  to  be  able  to  take  advan-
tage of cost reductions associated with a more competitive land mobile radio market. 
Understanding  the  difficulty  in  specifying  the  complex  operations  of  the  various 
components  of  a  land  mobile  radio  system,  the  public  safety  community  partnered 
with  the  Telecommunications  Industry  Association  (TIA)  to  serve  as  the  standards 
development organization (SDO) for this effort. Thus Project 25, or P–25 as we know 
it today, was launched. 

A  commonly  misunderstood  aspect  of  P–25  is  that  it  is  comprised  of  a  single 
standard. Instead, it is a suite of standards that specify the eight interfaces between 
the  various  components  of  a  land  mobile  radio  system  (handheld  to  handheld, 
handheld to mobile unit, mobile unit to tower, etc.): 

• Common air interface—this interface defines the wireless access between mobile 
and  portable  radios  and  between  the  subscriber  (portable  and  mobile)  radios 
and the fixed or base station radios; 

• Subscriber  data  peripheral  interface—this  interface  characterizes  the  signaling 
for  data  transfer  that  must  take  place  between  the  subscriber  radios  and  the 
data devices that may be connected to the subscriber radio; 

• Fixed station interface—this interface describes the signaling and messages be-
tween  the  RFSS  and  the  fixed  station  by  defining  the  voice  and  data  packets 
(that  are  sent  from/to  the  subscriber(s)  over  the  common  air  interface)  and  all 
of  the  command  and  control  messages  used  to  administer  the  fixed  station  as 
well as the subscribers that are communicating through the fixed station; 

• Console  interface—this  interface  is  similar  to  the  fixed  station  interface  but  it 
defines  all  the  signaling  and  messages  between  the  RFSS  and  the  console,  the 
position  that  a  dispatcher  or  a  supervisor  would  occupy  to  provide  commands 
and support to the personnel in the field; 

• Network  management  interface—this  interface  to  the  RFSS  allows  administra-
tors  to  control  and  monitor  network  fault  management  and  network  perform-
ance management. 

• Data  network  interface—this  interface  describes  the  RF  subsystem’s  connec-

tions to computers, data networks, external data sources, etc.; 

• Telephone  interconnect  interface—this  interface  between  the  RFSS  and  the 
Public Switched Telephone Network (PSTN) allows field personnel to make con-
nections  through  the  public  switched  telephone  network  by  using  their  radios 
rather than using cellular telephones; 

• Inter  RF  subsystem  interface—this  interface  permits  users  in  one  system  to 
communicate with users in a different system, from one jurisdiction to another, 
from one agency to another, from one city to another, etc. 

Over the last fifteen years only one of the P–25 interfaces, the Common Air Inter-
face  that  deals  with  the  functions  of  the  handheld  units  (i.e.,  walkie-talkie),  has 
been  advanced  to  a  level  where  it  would  help  satisfy  one  or  both  of  the  goals  of  P– 
25. The remainder of the interfaces either remains undefined, or lacks enough speci-
ficity  to  allow  for  a  common  implementation  of  the  interface;  in  other  words,  each 
manufacturer’s  implementation  of  the  interface  is  different  and  proprietary,  thus, 
resulting in systems that do not meet the ‘‘interoperability’’ requirements as defined 
by the steering committee. 

I would like to emphasize that the Common Air Interface is a major step forward 
and  extremely  important.  It  provides  a  level  of  interoperability  and  competition  in 
the handheld market that was not available before. However, it alone cannot satisfy 
the definition of interoperability that the public safety community is calling for. 

An  MOU  formalizing  the  relationship  between  the  public  safety  users  and  TIA, 
created  a  Steering  Committee  comprised  only  of  public  safety  and  government  rep-
resentatives  and  invested  that  committee  with  the  sole  authority  to  designate  a  P– 
25 standard. In addition, the MOU stipulates that the Steering Committee has wide 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

latitude in defining and adopting P–25 standards, and does not limit it to only TIA 
adopted standards. 

To reinforce the need to expeditiously move forward on all remaining P–25 inter-
face  standards  as  prioritized  by  the  Steering  Committee,  the  Co-Chair  of  the  P–25 
Steering Committee informed the membership of TIA that an agreed upon Inter-RF- 
Subsystem  Interface  (ISSI)  document  will  be  required  by  January  of  2006.  If  this 
deadline is not met the Steering Committee would vote to begin an alternate process 
for  developing  an  ISSI  standard.  The  Steering  Committee’s  plan  would  be  to  issue 
a  call  for  proposals  to  define  an  open  ISSI  standard,  select  the  best  proposal  and 
designate it the P–25 ISSI standard. 

It  needs  to  be  made  clear  that  it  is  everyone’s  desire  that  a  consensus  on  these 
standards  is  needed  and  that  formal  TIA  standards  be  adopted,  and  that  the  re-
maining P–25 interface standards be forthcoming within a time frame that satisfies 
the needs of public safety users and policymakers at all levels of government. 

It is not only important that the various P–25 interfaces are completed in a timely 
manner,  but  that  a  mechanism  exist  to  ensure  that  products  built  to  the  standard, 
meet all of the requirements of the standard. 

Over the last two years, NIST, with funds from the Department of Homeland Se-
curity  and  the  Department  of  Justice,  has  tested  a  number  of  the  hand  held  P–25 
radios  that  claim  to  meet  the  available  Common  Air  Interface  Standard.  Using  the 
test  procedures  called  for  in  the  standard,  NIST  found  that  none  of  the  available 
radios met all aspects of the standard. 

NIST, with the support of SAFECOM and the P–25 Steering Committee, is devel-
oping a P–25 Conformity Assessment Program. NIST is preparing and documenting 
standardized test protocols for the most important aspects of the Common Air Inter-
face  Standard.  The  standardized  test  protocols  will  then  be  provided  to  NIST’s  Na-
tional  Voluntary  Laboratory  Accreditation  Program  (NVLAP),  which  can  accredit 
third party laboratories across the country interested in offering these testing capa-
bilities. These test protocols would go a long way in assuring the public safety com-
munity that the equipment being purchased meets the P–25 standard. 

NIST is working closely with the P–25 Steering Committee and manufacturers to 
ensure that the test procedures are correct and that the results are accurate. In ad-
dition,  not  all  aspects  of  the  P–25  common  air  interface  will  be  immediately  avail-
able for testing through this program. To begin with, NIST is focusing on some basic 
functional tests of the radios, which will allow us to get the Conformity Assessment 
Program  up  and  running.  We  will  then  begin  to  add  interoperability  tests,  as  well 
as tests for more complex radio functions. 

In  summation,  Mr.  Chairman,  there  are  positive  steps  being  taken  by  leaders 
within the public safety community, key Federal programs, the Congress and indus-
try to significantly change the current environment and move the state of standards 
for  public  safety  forward.  This  time  next  year,  there  should  be  new  adopted  P–25 
interface  standards  and  manufacturers  will  have  begun  to  plan  new  products  lines 
that incorporate the new standards. Local, state, and Federal agencies procuring P– 
25  equipment  will  have  a  mechanism  in  place  to  ensure  that  the  products  they  are 
purchasing  truly  do  what  is  called  for  in  the  applicable  standard.  In  conjunction 
with the other efforts Dr. Boyd spoke of, I am confident that we are making signifi-
cant headway in the pursuit of communications interoperability. 

NIST  looks  forward  to  working  with  this  committee,  Congress,  our  Federal  part-
ners,  state  and  local  public  safety  officials,  and  leaders  in  industry  to  make  this 
happen.  Again,  I  am  honored  to  be  here  before  this  committee  today,  and  I  will  be 
happy to answer any questions that you may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
This  is  a  difficult  problem  for  us,  because  of  how  much  it  really 
interrelates  to  the  difficulty  of  the  spectrum  bill  we’re  going  to  act 
on this year. I’m trying to get the exact figures, but we were given 
the  figures  from  CBO  that  indicate  the  return  to  the  Government, 
for  the  Treasury,  would  be  considerably  higher—four  to  five  times 
higher—if  we  postponed  that  date  until  2009.  We  have  an  enor-
mous  demand  that  this  take  place  no  later  than  2007,  and  hope-
fully in 2006. I don’t know yet what the answer is going to be, but 
clearly we’ve been required by the budget resolution of this year to 
raise $4.8 billion by action of this committee, and the only possible 
way  to  do  that  is  by  passing  the  spectrum  bill.  We  hope  that  will 
be  part  of  the  reconciliation  process  and  that  will  become  law.  If 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

it is not, there will be no funds for interoperability within the com-
ing years. 

So, I know we’re all wanting to work on that. I’ve been informed 
by  our  staff  that  the  estimate  for  just  radios  and  equipment  for 
interoperability would be over $15 billion. So far, our programs call 
for  providing  funds  through  the  Justice  Department’s  Office  of 
Community  Oriented  Policing  Services,  COPS  Program.  And  I’m 
told  that  there  has  been  a  substantial  amount,  around  $92.7  mil-
lion this year alone, allocated to enforcement agencies on that pro-
gram.  In  addition,  there  was  money  that  came  out  of  other  funds. 
I  don’t  know  the  exact  total  of  those,  but  I’m  told  somewhere 
around $900 million, so far, to deal with interoperability. 

But,  Mr.  Orr,  I  should  interrupt  to  tell  you  this—you  mentioned 
our  dear  friend,  who’s  no  longer  with  us,  Senator  Hollings.  I  don’t 
know  if  you  were  the  staffer,  but  he  came  back  one  time  and  told 
me he had been in Hilton Head, and a staffer had come up to him 
and  said,  ‘‘Senator,  you’ve  got  to  go  back  to  Charleston.  They’re 
telling  lies  about  you  in  Charleston.’’  And  Fritz  told  him,  ‘‘No,  I’m 
going  to  stay  right  here,  they’re  telling  the  truth  about  me  here.’’ 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  We  miss  his  wit,  and  we  miss  his  help.  And  he 

would be of great help to us on this one now. 

But  can  any  of  you  tell  us,  What  is  the  ability  of  local  agencies 
to  meet  these  needs?  How  much  money  do  we  really  see  that  we 
have  to  have  in  the  near  term,  say  5  years,  from  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment? Dr. Boyd, do you have any idea? 

Dr.  BOYD.  As  you  can  imagine,  that’s  a  really  tough  question  to 
answer.  And  the  reason  it’s  a  tough  question  to  answer  is  that 
there’s no place in the United States you can go to, to find a picture 
of what the state of interoperability is in the United States. That’s 
why we’re undertaking a major baseline study that will produce re-
sults, probably around the middle of next year, that will give us the 
first genuinely statistically reliable picture of the state of interoper-
ability across the country. 

NIST is involved in that activity. We’re working closely with the 
Justice  Department  and  others  in  doing  this  work,  so  that  for  the 
first  time,  we  will  be  able  to  give  you  real  grounded  information 
about what that status is. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We’re  going  to  have  a  hearing  this  afternoon 
from  some  of  the  companies  that  are  involved  in  manufacturing 
these  systems.  I  shall  not  be  able  to  be  here,  because  of  the  De-
fense  bill  on  the  floor.  But  from  what  Mr.  Orr  says,  there’s  little 
probability we’re going to have ‘‘a system’’ that we could say every-
one should use, within the near term. Is that right, Mr. Orr? 

Mr.  ORR.  That  would  be  correct.  I  think  we’ll  have  progress  and 
movement  toward  more  complete  standards  regarding  P–25,  but  it 
is  still  some  time  before  we’ll  see  a  full  suite  of  P–25  standards 
that will be applied. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  My  time’s  almost  up,  but,  Chief,  you’re  the  one 
that’s in the trenches on this one. And you’re here representing, as 
I understand, the International Association, right? APCO? 

Mr. CARTER. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  What  is  the  suggestion  from  your  people?  What 
should  we  do?  Should  we  mandate  a  series  of  items  and  say  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

those  should  be  purchased  with  Federal  funds?  Should  we  get  in-
volved  at  all  in  delineating  what  will  be  acceptable  use  of  Federal 
funds, as far as this interoperability question is concerned? 

Mr. CARTER. I believe our perspective, from public safety, is that 
there  may  not  be  any  one  system  that’s  going  to  accomplish  inter-
operability nationwide. SAFECOM is doing some tremendous work 
to  identify  a  variety  of  issues  that  we  can  pull  together.  But  I  be-
lieve  that  standards  probably  will  be  the  answer.  Someone’s  going 
to have to step up to the plate and say, ‘‘This is the standard, and 
this is what we’re going to do.’’ 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  we’ve  got  standards  now,  but  we  haven’t 

got technology to meet the standards. 

Dr. Boyd? 
Dr.  BOYD.  Yes,  sir,  if  I  might  add  to  that.  For  some  time  there 
are  going  to  be  a  variety  of  systems  that  aren’t  going  to  work  di-
rectly  with  each  other,  simply  because  the  total  installed  base  in 
the  field  right  now  is  probably—and  this  is  very  conservative— 
somewhere  in  excess  of  $60  billion.  The  $15  billion  figure  you  re-
ferred  to  earlier  is  based  on  a  study  conducted  10  years  ago  that 
talked only about the portable units and the radios in the car. 

So,  what  that  means  is  that  we  have  to  look  at  a  system-of-sys-
tems approach. That is, How are we going to make a lot of systems 
work together? We think we can do that, and the way we’re direct-
ing  the  standards,  working  with  NIST  and  the  public  safety  com-
munity, is through common grant guidance, which the public safety 
community  helped  us  put  together,  and  which  helps  answer  the 
questions:  What  will  work  here?  What  can  you  live  with,  given 
what  you  have  now  and  what  you  know’s  going  to  be  in  place  for 
quite  a  while?—so  that  we  can  use  the  common  grant  guidance  to 
help  steer  all  of  the  Federal  grants.  That  guidance  is  now  incor-
porated  in  every  Federal  grant  program.  As  the  standards  come 
available,  they’ll  be  locked  into  that  guidance  as  we  continue  to 
tighten the guidance around the standards process. 
The CHAIRMAN. Well, Chief, isn’t the problem—— 
I’m running over time, because I’ve just been called to the Home-
land  Security  Conference  on  Appropriations,  so  I’m  going  to  leave. 
I  asked  Senator  Sununu  to  Chair.  This  will  be  my  last  question. 
Isn’t  the  problem  really  that  if  you  have  a  disaster,  like  Katrina 
or  Rita,  or  even  9/11,  when  we  call  in  responders  from  outside  of 
the  zone  to  come  assist  and  really  replace  some  of  those  that  may 
be missing or unable to do their job, for one reason or another, iso-
lated  by  storms  or  whatever,  that  the  people  that  come  in,  they 
have to be interoperable with what’s left there, don’t they? I mean, 
it is a national problem, isn’t it? 

Dr.  BOYD.  It’s  absolutely  a  national  problem.  But  one  of  the 
points  we  want  to  make,  and  the  public  safety  community  will  ex-
pand  on  this,  is  that  a  lot  of  the  elements  of  interoperability  al-
ready  are  there.  What  we  first  have  to  get  in  place  are  things  like 
governance agreements and how we’re going to work together. The 
agreements on this—— 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  let  me  tell  you  this.  I’ve  been  a  pilot  now 
for  a  long  time.  And  when  I  fly,  I  get  in  a  plane,  and  I  go  from 
Alaska  to  California.  I  just  punch  different  numbers,  and  I’m  to-
tally  interoperable  wherever  I  am.  I’ve  never  been  in  a  plane  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

I  couldn’t  reach  the  ground  with,  wherever  I  was,  because  that’s 
the system of aircraft radios. Why don’t we use radios like that for 
first responders? Why shouldn’t you be able to say, you’re on chan-
nel  A  if  you’re  in  California,  you’re  on  channel  C  if  you’re  in  Alas-
ka,  wherever—why  can’t  you  have  this?  Mr.  Orr,  why  don’t  we 
have those kinds of radios for these people? 

Mr.  ORR.  That  was  the  object—as  I  said  in  my  opening  state-
ment,  that  was  the  object  of  Project  25.  I  think  the  issue  is  that 
industry  has  not  come  to  consensus  on  this  issue  over  the  last  15 
years,  and  the  bottom  line  is,  it  needs  closure.  We  need  to  finish 
these  standards.  Industry  needs  to  come  to  consensus.  Or  some 
other action is going to be taken, as I was talking about during my 
opening  remarks.  There  are  alternative  methods  to  make  these 
standards,  through  the  steering  committee.  But  the  bottom  line  is, 
industry,  to  date,  has  not  come  to  consensus  on  creating  those  ra-
dios. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  The  weather  bureau  has  now  given  us  radio 
availability  that  we  can  turn  on  wherever  we  are,  as  a  pilot,  and 
get local weather. 

Dr. BOYD. If I may, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. That’s interoperability. 
Dr.  BOYD.  I  also  have  a  commercial  pilot’s  license,  sir.  If  I  may 
suggest, aviation is on a single band. In any given area, only a few 
hundred communicators are likely to be involved, and they’re under 
a  control  system  where  they  talk  to  the  controlled  operator.  So, 
they  talk  under  certain  circumstances  in  a  relatively  small  area. 
So,  as  control  areas,  you  cross—you  know,  whether  you’re  on 
ground  control  or  whether  you’re  on  approach,  each  of  those  are 
specified  for  a  region,  and  they  handle  a  relatively  small  number 
of stations. 

The  public  safety  community,  on  the  other  hand,  represents 
60,000  individual  systems  trying  to  control  things  and  manage 
things  within  their  own  area  of  responsibility  and  representing 
some three million individual public safety operators. So that chan-
nels  which  can  be  identified  in  a  region  to  handle  a  few  hundred 
aircraft, when a channel is applied, for example, in his department, 
because  the  adjacent  folks  can’t  have  that  same  channel  without 
lots of prior coordination to pull together how that’s going to work. 

You never wind up—— 
The  CHAIRMAN.  It’s  not  the  technology  problem  that  he’s  talking 

about, then. 

Dr. BOYD. Technology is only a piece of it. 
The CHAIRMAN. It’s a volume of use problem. 
Dr.  BOYD.  Well,  it’s  a  combination  of  issues,  I  mean,  with  tech-
nology  at  the  center.  But  most  of  the  things  required  to  achieve 
interoperability  in  the  near  term  already  exist.  They  require  seri-
ous  agreements,  planning,  governance  kinds  of  arrangements 
across  jurisdictions  to  work.  In  RapidCom,  for  example,  in  ten  cit-
ies,  we  were  able  to  establish  an  emergency  command  level  of 
interoperability  in  each  city  with  no  new  resources,  simply  by 
working with these communities, and the communities around each 
of  those  cities,  to  come  together  to  agree  on  how  they’re  going  to 
approach these things. For example, in the aviation community—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I’ve  got  to  leave,  but  if  you  move  some  of 
those  people  over  to  Chief  Carter’s  area,  they  wouldn’t  be  inter-
operable with him, would they? 

Dr.  BOYD.  If  they’ve  worked  out  these  agreements  in  advance, 
they  can  be.  And  if  we’ve  identified  what  kind  of  patching  equip-
ment’s going to be required, they can be. 

The CHAIRMAN. Is there any need for further involvement by the 
Federal  Government,  Mr.  Orr,  in  mandating  that  this  come  to  a 
closure? 

Mr. ORR. Certainly, at NIST we haven’t talked about mandating 
coming, but we are providing all of our resources to give the users 
involved  in  Project  25  the  technical  and  engineering  resources  to 
finish  this  out,  and,  with  the  support  of  people  and  programs  like 
Dr. Boyd and SAFECOM, who will then take those standards that 
the  P–25  steering  committee  designates  and  put  it  in  the  grant 
guidance,  therefore  putting  the  weight  of  Federal  grants  and  pro-
curement behind those standards, I do think we can move this for-
ward in a much shorter amount of time than has been. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I’d  call  the  Committee’s  attention  to  the 
SAFECOM  interoperability  continuum  chart  that  you  have  avail-
able. I think it’s very informative, and we thank you for that. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator Sununu, will you start? 
Senator SUNUNU [presiding]. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Not  to  panic.  Senator  Boxer  and  Senator  Lautenberg,  I  don’t 
know which of you were here next, but I’ll certainly turn to Senator 
Boxer, then Senator Lautenberg for questioning. 

Go right ahead. 
Senator BOXER. Thank you so much. The only reason is that I’ve 
got  another  obligation  that  started  3  minutes  ago.  So,  I  will  be 
brief. 

I  think,  since  Senator  Stevens  told  a  Fritz  Hollings  story,  I’m 

going to tell one, too, before he leaves, very quickly. 

Fritz,  one  day,  turned  to  me,  he  says,  ‘‘You  know  why  my  wife 
and  I  get  along  so  well?’’  And,  of  course,  like  a  good  straight  per-
son, I said, ‘‘Why?’’ He said, ‘‘We’re both in love with the same per-
son.’’ 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  BOXER.  And  we  really  do  miss  him.  I  was  in  love  with 

him, too, but—anyway. 

Here’s  the  situation.  I  think  we  need  more  spectrum,  better 
equipment,  and  better  coordination.  Does  anyone  disagree  that 
those three things are important? 

[No response.] 
Senator  BOXER.  OK.  And  as  I  look  at  it,  more  spectrum,  Mr. 
Chairman, I think that it does fall on us to make that happen. And 
we can make that happen as we look at this whole digital question. 
So, that’s one. 

Better equipment. We have to help. We cannot unload a $15 bil-
lion problem on the locals. And one that is really—this issue is dic-
tated  by  our  national  circumstance.  It’s  our  national  circumstance 
that we’re a target of terrorists. It’s our national circumstance if we 
have a disaster. This isn’t something any State should feel respon-
sible for. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

The  third  one  is  better  coordination,  and  that’s  up  to  the  locals. 

31 

They have to tell us how we can help them do that. 

So, I guess my frustration, a little bit—I heard in the Chairman’s 
voice,  although  sometimes  we  think  we’re  in  agreement,  and  it 
turns  out  we’re  not,  but  we  might  be—in  this.  Why  is  it  going  to 
take  us  to  2023,  Dr.  Boyd—2023—Lord  knows  where  we’ll  all  be 
then—to  get  this  done?  Is  there  anything  we  can  do,  as  your  help-
ers, to get this done sooner? 

Dr.  BOYD.  Well,  first,  let  me  make  clear  that  2023  was  never 
identified  as  the  date  by  which  these  things  would  happen.  The 
date  comes  out  of  a  meeting  that  we  had  with  the  public  safety 
community,  where  we  said,  ‘‘Look,  forget  everything  that  exists 
right  now  that  you’re  thinking  about,  and  tell  us  what  the  perfect 
world  would  be,  and  let’s  take  2023  and  say,  by  then,  how  would 
you  like  the  world  to  look?  What  exactly  are  all  the  capabilities 
you’d  like  to  have?’’  That  doesn’t  mean  we’re  not  interested  in  try-
ing to make that happen—— 

Senator BOXER. Well, I hear—— 
Dr. BOYD.—sooner. 
Senator  BOXER.—you.  I’m  glad  you—my  own  view  is,  we  don’t 
have  that  much  patience,  those  of  us  here.  So,  even  if  it  isn’t  the 
perfect  world,  you  know,  we  need  to  get  to  some  better  world, 
which  leads  me  to  my  last  question,  of  Chief  Carter,  which  deals 
with what happened on the ground. In your written testimony, you 
said  that  all  emergency  response  agencies  in  your  parish  in  Lou-
isiana  operate  on  an  800  MHz  radio  system  that  provides  good 
interoperability throughout the region. Is that right? 

Mr. CARTER. That’s correct. 
Senator  BOXER.  However,  when  some  of  your  personnel  went  to 
help  in  New  Orleans,  following  Hurricane  Katrina,  they  were  un-
able  to  operate  their  radios  on  the  State  systems  due  to  software 
incompatibility, a problem that can only be fixed for $800 per radio, 
approximately. Is that correct? 

Mr. CARTER. Yes, ma’am, that’s correct. 
Senator  BOXER.  OK.  If  your  department  were  to  receive—and  it 
might  not  be  your  department—if  the  appropriate  departments 
were  to  receive  sufficient  funds  to  fix  all  your  radios,  at  $800 
apiece, would that be a good thing for you? 

Mr.  CARTER.  It  would  be  a  great  thing  for  us,  in  the  event  that 
we  deploy  personnel  and  equipment  to  an  area  like  New  Orleans, 
for instance, that is so far outside the operational boundaries of our 
system, yes, ma’am, absolutely. 

Senator  BOXER.  Mr.  Chairman,  the  reason  I  asked  that  question 
is,  a  lot  of  times  our  eyes  glaze  over  when  we  hear  2023.  Here  is 
someone  on  the  ground,  Chief  Carter,  telling  us,  for  $800  apiece, 
they can solve a major problem. I don’t know why the Senate voted 
down,  three  times,  money  for  this.  Once  was  my  amendment.  So, 
I—it hurt my heart. I lost by one or two votes. I forget. One or two 
votes. Ridiculous. We need to do more, and not wait until 2023. 

And I just want to thank the whole panel, because I think you’re 
smart, you’re good, and we’re going to need you. And why industry 
can’t get their act together is something I don’t get. But, certainly, 
if  we,  as  a  Congress,  could  come  together  and  say,  ‘‘This  is  a  pri-
ority,’’ that should be enough incentive, in a capitalistic society, for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

them  to  step  up  to  the  plate  with  something  that’s  going  to  help 
us through all this. 

So, Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
Senator SUNUNU. Thank you, Senator Boxer. 
Senator Lautenberg? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Our  order  got  a  little  mixed  here,  and  because  there’s  pressure 
with  so  many  things  going  on,  I  don’t  want  any  of  you,  at  the  wit-
ness table, to feel that there’s lack of interest. There’s lack of time, 
but there’s no lack of interest. And I thank you for your testimony. 
And coming from New Jersey, where we lost 700 people on 9/11, 
and  a  large  part  of  the  loss  was  attributed  to  the  fact  that  we 
couldn’t  communicate,  and  we  had  people  running  upstairs,  rescue 
people—firefighters, emergency service people, and police, trying to 
get  upstairs  to  help  people,  and  it  cost  lots  of  lives  of  those 
servicepeople.  So,  we’re  particularly  in  tune  with  the  question  of 
interoperability. 

And I want to ask Chief Carter—and, again, thanks for your inci-
sive  testimony.  Being  on  the  ground  there  helps  identify  the  prob-
lems,  and  rather  quickly.  Some  cities,  there’s  a  wireless  network, 
allows  police  anywhere  in  the  city  to  send/receive  data,  including 
photographs,  car  information,  fingerprints  to  and  from  head-
quarters  in  real-time.  Now,  municipal  WiFi,  are  you  familiar  with 
that,  Chief  Carter?  It’s  the  community’s  ability  to  have  a  commu-
nications  system  that  may  not  be  available  from  the  conventional 
commercial  channels.  Municipal  WiFi  offers  the  best  opportunity 
for  this  kind  of  technology  to  spread  across  the  country,  and  yet 
some States are blocking cities from setting up their own network. 
Are  you  familiar  enough  with  the  WiFi  systems  to  comment  on 
whether  or  not  the  municipal  networks  offer  a  greater  oppor-
tunity—more  timely—for  advancing  police  communications,  at 
least? That means that they’re going to be told what’s going on, or 
in  communication  with  those  who  are  on  the  street  or  those  who 
are on the particular assignment at that moment. 

Mr.  CARTER.  In  all  honesty,  I  am  not  familiar  enough  with  that 

technology to speak to it. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. OK. We’re looking very closely at that. 
And,  Mr.  Chairman,  I’m  very  hopeful  about  something  that’s 
happening.  And  I  know  that  you,  in  particular,  Senator  Sununu, 
are  very  interested  in  the  technology  side  of  things.  And  that  we 
have  the  prospect  being  developed  right  now  of  having  a  satellite 
communications system through cell phones, instruments as simple 
as that, that won’t worry about the height of the towers that might 
be  destroyed—the  cell  towers—in  a  particular  moment.  So,  we’re 
fairly  optimistic,  very  hopeful  that  that  can  be  part  of  a  solution 
to the problem. 

You  know,  I  come  out  of  the  computer  industry,  and  we  tried  to 
do  whatever  we  could  to  advance  the  technology,  et  cetera,  on  our 
own, but we depended on different elements—manufacture, design, 
et  cetera—to  make  it  all  happen.  But  here  we  have  a  problem  so 
complex  that  I  think  the  government  has  to  be  very  careful  in  es-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

tablishing  standards  that  industry  can  meet  and  talk  about  with-
out  fear  of  violating  any  of  the  rules.  And  so,  we’re  encouraged  by 
that. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Inouye,  who  couldn’t  be  here;  asks  this 
question,  Mr.  Orr.  An  issue  that  you  raise  in  your  testimony  is  a 
need  for  some  form  of  quality  control  to  ensure  that  the  devices 
marketed  and  sold  as  compliant  with  certain  public  safety  stand-
ards are, in fact, compliant. To the point I was earlier making. ‘‘In-
deed,  my  staff,’’  he  says,  ‘‘has  informed  me  that  you  have  shared 
with them a demonstration of how certain public safety radios per-
formed in compliance tests with P–25 standards. And could you tell 
us  something  about  that  testing,  and  perhaps  even  give  us  a  brief 
demonstration of how it works?’’ 

Mr. ORR. Sure. And it was done in a laboratory in Boulder, Colo-
rado, in the Department of Commerce labs. And, simplistically, set-
ting up that test, what it does is, Project 25 radios were developed 
to  be  the  next  generation  of  digital  radios.  Currently,  the  largest 
percentage  of  radios  out  there  today,  of  course,  are  analog  radios. 
Project  25  is  meant  to  be  the  next  generation  digital  radio.  How-
ever—public safety, the manufacturers all understand there’s going 
to  be  a  migration  to  those  digital  radios,  and  there  will  be  a  lot  of 
time between now and 2023, or whatever the time is, where you’re 
going  to  have  a  mix  of  analog  and  digital  radios.  And  the  purpose 
of  Project  25,  and  a  part  of  the  requirements  of  Project  25,  is  that 
it is backward compatible and can operate with—both in the digital 
environment  and  the  analog  environment.  And  so,  you  should  be 
able—and  are  supposed  to  be  able,  with  a  Project  25  radio,  to  be 
able to operate right—in contiguous bands and contiguous channels 
with  an  analog  radio  and  an  analog  channel,  and  without  having 
any interference between the digital and the analog channels. 

What this test is, is of two radios, one operating in—well, they’re 
operating in analog mode, and they’re getting a digital interference 
signal, and it shows you what would happen currently with the P– 
25  radios  if  they  were  operating  in  a  situation  where  there  were 
digital  and  analog  channels  adjacent  to  each  other.  And,  again,  in 
the  statement  requirements  for  Project  25,  these  radios  should 
have no problem doing what they’re supposed to do, which is being 
audible. 

And  so,  the  first  sound  file  I’ll  play,  you  will  actually  be  able  to 

hear the voice. 

[Audio played.] 
Mr.  ORR.  So,  that’s  a  person  in  wideband  analog  mode  on  a 
Project  25  radio,  getting  some  minimal  interference  from  an  adja-
cent channel operating in digital mode. You can still hear the voice. 
The  next  radio  is  another  Project  25  radio,  same  circumstances. 
[Audio played.] 
Mr. ORR. So, obviously there’s a wide variation in how the stand-
ard  is  being  implemented.  Now,  this  demonstration  isn’t  meant  to 
show that there are radios out there that are causing lives lost. Ob-
viously, very few radios out there today are Project 25, so you don’t 
have a situation where you have a whole lot of ultra-wide—or wide-
band—or  analog  and  digital  radios  operating  in  adjacent  channels. 
However,  as  we  start  to  migrate  to  digital,  you  will  start  to  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

that,  and  buyers  won’t  even  know  whether  or  not  their  radio  is 
going  to  allow  them  to  operate  the  way  they  expect  it  to  operate. 
And  so,  what  we’re  doing  is  creating  a  conformance  testing  pro-
gram, along with SAFECOM, that will allow public safety to make 
correct  buying  decisions  based  on  what  their  needs  are  from  the 
radio, and understand how they operate. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  ask  unanimous  consent 
that  an  opening  statement  that  I  would  have  made  be  included  in 
the record. 

And  I  assume  that  the  record  will  be  kept  open  for  questions. 

We’ve run out of time, and I don’t want to overuse mine. 

Senator SUNUNU. Without objection, so ordered. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr. Chairman, 
9/11 revealed serious problems with our ability to communicate during a disaster. 
When  firefighters  and  police  couldn’t  talk  to  one  another,  we  all  became  familiar 

with the term ‘‘inter-operability.’’ 

Hurricane Katrina gave us another wakeup call. 
It  reminded  us  that  before  we  can  have  inter-operability  during  a  disaster,  we 

need operability. 

After  last  month’s  deadly  storm,  almost  all  of  the  communications  systems  that 

we take for granted were shut down in the affected region. 

The wireline telecommunications network sustained enormous damage. According 
to  BellSouth,  the  largest  wireline  provider  in  the  region,  more  than  three  million 
phone lines were knocked out of service. 

Local  wireless  networks  also  sustained  considerable  damage  as  thousands  of  cell 

sites and many wireless switches were knocked out of service. 

Radio  and  TV  broadcasters  play  an  important  role  in  providing  information  dur-
ing  an  emergency.  But  of  the  41  broadcast  radio  stations  located  in  New  Orleans 
and  the  surrounding  area,  only  two  AM  and  two  FM  stations  remained  on  the  air 
immediately after the storm. 

This  event  made  clear  that  we  need  a  backup  plan  for  communications  during  a 

disaster. 

We  need  ‘‘redundancy’’  in  networks,  including  the  9–1–1  emergency  system,  and 

we need alternative sources of power. 

I  would  encourage  this  committee  and  the  FCC  to  consider  how  we  put  in  place 

redundant systems that can withstand disasters—both natural and terrorist. 

These  could  include  satellite  communications  and  VoIP  telephone  service  such  as 

that provided by Vonage, and other technologies. 

The  big  lesson  that  we  must  learn  from  this  disaster  is  that  we  can  never  be  too 

prepared. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Let  me  ask  a  few  questions  here  about  the  P– 
25  standard.  I  don’t  know  a  great  deal  about  some  of  the  techno-
logical  developments  that  you’re  discussing,  but  you  talked  a  lot 
about  conformance  testing  and  standard  development  and  certifi-
cation. This is a process that began 15 years ago, correct? 

Mr. ORR. Correct. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  And  I  will  use  the  word  ‘‘you’’  here,  but  I  un-
derstand  ‘‘you’’  haven’t  been  working  on  it  the  whole  time.  You’re 
not  responsible  for  all  of  this.  There  are  obviously  a  lot  of  people. 
So, I don’t want you to take my line of questioning personally. 

How much money has been spent on the project over the last 15 

years, roughly? 

Mr.  ORR.  I  really  can’t  answer  that,  because  the  project  itself  is 
an  industry  project.  It’s  completely  industry-driven.  However,  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

does  have  that  public  safety  contingent  that  I  talked  about.  From 
a  Federal  perspective  of  how  much  support  we’ve  been  given,  I 
would  estimate  maybe  $2–3  million.  And  we’ve  only  been  involved 
lightly up until—— 

Senator  SUNUNU.  So,  the  Federal  support  is  relatively  modest. 

Mr. ORR. Right. 
Senator  SUNUNU.—the  big  cost  is  going  to  be  in  replacing  all  of 

Obviously—— 

these radios. 

Mr. ORR. Yes. 
Senator SUNUNU. There are eight interfaces that you’re trying to 
standardize.  Only  one  of  the  eight  has  been  developed  so  far,  cor-
rect? 

Mr. ORR. Correct. 
Senator SUNUNU. How much longer is it going to take to develop 

the other seven? 

Mr. ORR. What we’ve done is, we’ve worked with and assisted the 
public  safety  community,  the  steering  community  involved  in  P– 
25—to prioritize the remaining interfaces, which ones are most im-
portant  that  need  to  be  covered.  They  have  declared  to  the  indus-
try, ‘‘Stop working on all other interfaces except the following.’’ And 
so, right now, the next one teed up—there are two teed up. There’s 
actually a fixed-station interface. But the most important one is the 
ISSI  I  spoke  about  in  my  opening  statement.  And  that—the  fixed- 
station, they expect to have a standard, or at least a de facto stand-
ard, done October, so next month, which is a major achievement for 
Project 25. And then the ISSI, which is a very major achievement, 
they’re  expecting  to  have  a  document  that  can  be  balloted  and 
voted  on  by  January—done  by  January  and  balloted  and  voted  by 
March. 

Senator SUNUNU. Realistically, a couple more over the next 12 to 

18 months. 

Mr. ORR. I would be very happy if we got three over the next—— 
Senator SUNUNU. OK. 
Mr. ORR.—12 months. 
Senator SUNUNU. So, we’re talking about a time frame of, frank-
ly,  years  to  complete  all  eight.  And  then,  obviously,  the  purchase 
of  compliant  equipment,  radio  equipment’s  going  to  be  required. 
Did  you  have  an  estimate  for  the  total  cost  for  people  to  comply 
with this standard and meet the standard? 

Mr.  ORR.  It  should  be  fairly  low.  First  of  all,  the  current  plans 

for the conformance testing is that NIST—— 

Senator  SUNUNU.  No,  no,  no,  I’m  talking  about  replacing  the  ra-

Mr. ORR. Oh. 
Senator SUNUNU. We’re talking about billions—— 
Mr. ORR. No, no. We—— 
Senator SUNUNU.—of dollars—— 
Mr. ORR. Yes, absolutely. 
Senator SUNUNU.—$10, $15, $20 billion, something like that. OK. 
I  mean,  my  question  is,  for  all  of  this  work  that  has  been  done, 
starting a 15-year time frame—granted, the development’s going on 
now—whether  or  not  the  whole  approach  is,  quite  frankly,  out-
dated.  You  know,  this  is  a  device  that  has  IP  capability.  And, 

dios. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

granted,  this  is  not  a  public  safety  communication  device.  But  the 
idea  is  that  this  can  communicate  to  anyone  else  with  an  IP  ad-
dress,  anywhere  in  the  world,  let  alone  anywhere  in  the  country. 
And, obviously, depending on my access to the IP network, it could 
be  WiFi,  it  could  be  the  municipal  network  Frank  Lautenberg  is 
talking  about,  it  could  be  a  local  area  network  on  a  wireless,  it 
could  also  be  a  wire-based.  But  it’s  an  IP  device.  The  IP  protocol 
has  obviously  proven  itself  to  be  pretty  robust,  pretty  capable.  It’s 
an existing interface standard, if you will, that can be enhanced by 
different features. 

It  seems  to  me  it  would  be  a  little  bit  less  expensive,  a  little  bit 
more straightforward, to implement a system using that kind of an 
interface, rather than try to develop, standardize, test, adopt stand-
ards, and then have to have everyone spend a great deal of money 
to  replace  all  of  these  radios.  What  is  wrong  with  that  thinking? 
And,  Dr.  Boyd,  why  don’t  we  let  Mr.  Orr  respond,  but  I’m  cer-

tainly very interested in your response to that, as well. 

Mr.  ORR.  They  will  probably  be  very  similar,  I  would  imagine.  I 
would  just  say  that,  on  your  statement,  much  of  Project  25,  as  it 
moves forward, is IP-based. We are basing it on available IP stand-
ards,  and  it  will  be  based  on  the  kind  of  technologies  that  you’re 
thinking of, as well. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  So,  given  that,  why  is  this  taking  so  long,  and 
why  are  we  presupposing  that  so  many  devices  out  there  have  to 
be,  sort  of,  switched  out  or  will  be  rendered  non-compatible?  Obvi-
ously, there are a lot of radios out there that aren’t IP-compatible. 
But  why  are  the  costs  of  implementation  assumed  to  be  so  high, 
given  that  there’s  such  a  large  and  growing  number  of  IP-compat-
ible networks out there now? 

Mr.  ORR.  The  hope  is  that  once  a  system  like  Project  25,  based 
on  IP,  is  implemented,  it  will  actually  bring  down  the  costs,  and 
they will be able to reap the benefits of the kind of cheaper equip-
ment  that  people—that  consumers  today  are  able  to  take  advan-
tage of in the marketplace. 

Senator SUNUNU. Dr. Boyd? 
Dr.  BOYD.  The  IP-based  approach  that  the  commercial  networks 
use  is  predicated  on  a  number  of  things  that  don’t  fit  well  in  the 
public safety environment. One is an infrastructure which is large-
ly wired or fiber or connected on that basis, so that they don’t have 
weak signal problems and they don’t have time-of-arrival problems 
over  large  distances,  as  you  will  tend  to  have  in  IP  radio—many 
of those things haven’t yet been adequately—— 

Senator SUNUNU. Time-of-arrival problems? 
Dr. BOYD. OK—— 
Senator SUNUNU. Are you talking about—— 
Dr. BOYD.—if you have a packet—— 
Senator SUNUNU.—wait packet? 
Dr.  BOYD.—if  you  have  a  series  of  packets,  the  series  of  packets 
are transmitted from a device. A packet is really what IP is trans-
mitting.  That  the  order  in  which  they  arrive,  and  how  often  they 
arrive, begins to create all kinds of problems. Some are issues asso-
ciated with collisions. Those are managed by routers and by servers 
in  the  cellular  system.  And  cellular  systems  are  designed  around 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

an  infrastructure  that  has  a  relatively  short  range.  Cellular  is  in 
a fairly small box. 

The  public  safety  guys,  on  the  other  hand,  have  to  serve  the  en-
tire  county.  And  they  can’t—they  have  some  trouble  in  relying  on 
a  commercial  infrastructure,  which  is  probably  one  of  the  first 
things that will collapse, because these are infrastructures that are 
traditionally  built  to  about  a  10  percent  overcapacity.  In  fact,  we 
exceed that normally during rush hour every afternoon. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Well,  I  understand  your  point  about  not  nec-
essarily  wanting  to  rely  on  an  exclusively  commercial  infrastruc-
ture, but I seem to say—or you seem to say that there are latency 
problems  that  wouldn’t  make  an  IP  system  effective  over  an  area 
larger than a county. 

Dr. BOYD. No, I’m not saying that. What I’m saying is, there are 
more  technical  problems  there  than—in  this  kind  of  environment 
than  you’re  going  to  find  in  the  cellular  or  the  wired  environment. 
I  think  the  critical  point  I’d  make  is  that,  whatever  system  you 
decide  to  put  in  place  has  to  meet  their  requirements.  What  I  told 
industry  recently  was,  there  are  lots  of  opportunities  for  commer-
cial  activities,  whether  it’s  IP-based  or  satellite  systems  or  oth-
ers—— 

Senator SUNUNU. But what—— 
Dr. BOYD.—that help provide—— 
Senator  SUNUNU.  I’m  sorry.  I  apologize  for  interrupting,  but  you 

seem to use the words ‘‘commercial’’ and ‘‘IP’’ interchangeably. 

Dr. BOYD. No. 
Senator SUNUNU. And just because something is IP doesn’t mean 

it’s commercial. 

Dr. BOYD. No. That’s correct. 
Senator SUNUNU. OK. 
Dr. BOYD. But if you go to IP, remember that there are very few 

IP-capable radios currently in the field. 

Senator SUNUNU. I suppose—— 
Dr. BOYD. In public safety. 
Senator  SUNUNU.—in  public  safety.  And,  I  mean,  quite  frankly, 
I have to wonder if that’s, in part, because of all of the micro-man-
agement  and  manipulation  that’s—well  intended,  but  all  of  the 
micro-management  and  manipulation  that  comes  from—whether 
it’s  Federal  level  or  State  level—but  us  trying  to  force  a  standard 
on  them,  and  whether  or  not  that  discourages  some  of  the  innova-
tion  and  adoption  of  new  technologies  when  they’re  available.  I 
don’t  know  that  that’s  the  case,  but  I  think  it’s  a  question  that  is 
certainly worth asking. 

Dr. BOYD. I think you’ve made the most critical point to be made 

here. I think, in fact, you’ve made it—— 

Senator SUNUNU. Well, now you’re just—— 
Dr. BOYD. No, I think you’ve made—— 
Senator SUNUNU.—drawing on flattery. 
[Laughter.] 
Dr. BOYD. You have made exactly the case that we’ve been argu-
ing  for,  for  some  time—and  I  think  Chief  Willis  and  others  will 
agree—and that is that we believe this has to be driven by the first 
responders  themselves,  that  it’s  not  appropriate  to  tell  them  what 
they  have  to  have.  We  should  be  listening  to  them.  We  should  be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

listening  to  what  their  requirements  are.  Then  we  should  be  re-
sponding  to  that.  And  that’s  the  way  we’ve  built  the  entire 
SAFECOM  program,  so  that  Chief  Willis  and  APCO,  for  example, 
are critical players in helping to do exactly those things. 

But,  I  agree  with  you,  it  has  got  to  be  driven  at  that  level.  It 

can’t be pushed down on them. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you, Dr. Boyd. 
Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  want  to  ask,  if  I  can,  about  just  a  mechanical  aspect  of  what 
we saw in Katrina. It’s my understanding that some of the systems 
that  were  in  place  down  there  on  the  Gulf  Coast,  as  I  understand 
it, were designed to withstand a hurricane, and to survive a hurri-
cane. And my impression is, many of these systems, that were sup-
posedly hurricane proof, failed. In fact, I saw some towers—you all 
have seen the pictures where all the towers are just bent over, bro-
ken  in  half,  basically.  And  so,  my  question,  for  whoever  wants  to 
take it, is, first, Is that assumption correct, that there are systems 
down there in place that were supposed to be hurricane proof? And, 
second,  if  that’s  the  case,  what  happened  to  them?  Why  did  they 
fail? 

So, who wants to answer that? 
Mr.  CARTER.  I  believe  that  there  were  a  number  of  systems  in 
south  Louisiana.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  all  those  systems  were  de-
signed  to  be  hurricane  proof  to  some  degree.  I’m  not  totally  sure 
that  they  were  designed  to  be  hurricane-proof  to  the  degree  that 
Katrina  hit  us.  As  far  as  the  damage,  the  wind,  of  course,  is  one 
of  the  causes  that  damaged  the  radio  networks.  Following  the 
wind, the break of the levees caused the flooding, which, of course, 
then knocked the power out. So, there were a number of issues that 
caused many of those sites to fail. The wind, of course, initially, for 
a lot of them. And I, too, saw—when I went on my trip down there, 
radio  towers  that  were  basically  broken  in  half.  So,  I  can  only  as-
sume that, although those towers were designed for hurricane-force 
winds, they were not designed for a Category 4 or 5, which is what 
we actually got. 

Senator PRYOR. When I see that, I think, if they are designed for 
hurricane-force  winds,  you  know,  I’d  be  curious  about  seeing  the 
specs  on  what  they  were  designed  for.  And,  second,  I’d  be  curious 
about  what  the  marketing  was  for  the  companies  that  sold  these 
systems  to  the  localities  down  there,  to  the  various  companies  and 
governments, et cetera. 

And, third, I would want to know about any—not so much design 
defects,  in  that  maybe  they  weren’t  designed  properly—and  maybe 
they  weren’t,  but  I’d  want  to  know  about  that—but  I’d  also  want 
to  know  if  there  were  issues  of  rust  or  wear-and-tear  or  lack  of 
maintenance, you know, those types of things. Now, are you famil-
iar with—can you answer any of those questions for me? 

Mr.  CARTER.  No,  sir,  probably  not,  especially  not  specifically  to 

the systems in the south part of the State. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Does  anybody  else  want  to  take  a  stab  at 

any of that? Any impressions that you have? 

Dr. BOYD. Of course, these systems are managed locally, so that’s 

the right place to go to, to ask that kind of question. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. In other words, we’ll have to get inside of 

the facts of each specific case to see. 

Also,  my  impression  is  that  some  of  the  systems  failed  maybe 
due  to  lack  of  planning,  and,  to  some  extent,  lack  of  design,  be-
cause—I’ve  heard  something  very  practical—that  generators  were 
down  on  the  ground  level,  even  in  basements,  and  they  flooded. 
And, you know, of course, they lost their power source. Are you all 
familiar  with  those  stories,  as  well?  Are  those  stories  true?  And, 
you know—— 

Dr. BOYD. I can tell you, there’s a major effort in the Department 
to collect lessons learned and that kind of information. And so, the 
Department  is  going  to  be  talking  about  the  kinds  of  things  they 
found.  But  it’s  still  a  little  early  for  us  to  know  what  those  things 
are. Right now, it’s the recovery effort that’s most important. 

Senator PRYOR. Sure. 
Well,  we’ve  heard  a  lot  of—like  you,  we’ve  heard  a  lot  of  anec-
dotal  stories  about  things  that  went  right  and  things  that  went 
wrong.  And  so,  part  of  what  we  are  doing  here  is  the  oversight  of 
all this. 

One  thing,  by  the  way,  I  want  to  say—I  know  we  have  to  take 
a break here in just a moment, Mr. Chairman, because we have to 
vote on Judge Roberts here, momentarily—but one thing I’d like to 
say  is,  some  of  the  companies  have  really  done  a  great  job  after 
Katrina to try to, not just restore services to their people, but also 
some  of  the  nuts  and  bolts  of  even  suspending  billing  during  this 
time,  you  know,  things  like  that.  And  some  of  these  companies,  I 
think, really do deserve quite a bit of credit for the actions they’ve 
taken in the aftermath of Katrina. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  do  have  a  few  more  questions,  but  maybe  it 
might  be  better  if  we  submit  those  for  the  record,  given  the  short-
ness of our time here. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  supposedly,  as  I  understand  it,  the  leader-

ship would like us to be over there before the vote starts. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  The  Senator  is  correct.  And,  without  objection, 
the record will be held open for 2 weeks, so that Members may sub-
mit additional questions. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Any  other  comments  or  questions,  Senator 

Senator PRYOR. No, thank you. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  I  had  one  final  question  for  Mr.  Moran.  How 
much  spectrum  is  available  exclusively  for  public  safety  use?  Is  97 
MHz the right number? 

Mr.  MORAN.  At  the  present  time  it’s  not  the  right  number,  be-
cause  the  24  MHz  in  the  700  band,  at  this  point,  in  many  parts 
of  the  country,  is  not  usable  exclusively  for  public  safety  because 
of the broadcast issues—— 

Senator SUNUNU. OK. 
Mr. MORAN.—that you’ve mentioned earlier. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  So,  that’ll  be  a  correct  number  once  we  com-

plete our work and—— 

Pryor? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Mr. MORAN. Yes, it will be. 
Senator SUNUNU.—pass a—— 
Mr. MORAN. Yes, it would be. 
Senator SUNUNU.—a transition bill. 
Thank you very much. Thank you, to all of our witnesses. 
The hearing’s adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:17 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  today’s  two  hearings  on  communications  in 

Last week, Members of this committee raised multiple communications issues and 

disasters. 

proposed various solutions. 

I  have  focused  many  of  my  efforts  on  a  couple  proposals  that  I  think  could  make 
a  huge  difference  to  our  Nation’s  emergency  9–1–1  system  and  make  our  citizens 
safer during disasters. 

One  of  the  tragedies  caused  by  Hurricane  Katrina  was  the  crippling  of  the  9–1– 
1 emergency network. Key 9–1–1 centers were either knocked out by water or were 
overloaded  with  calls.  This  left  citizens  with  no  way  to  call  for  help  and  it  severely 
hampered rescue efforts. 

Because the current 9–1–1 system doesn’t have built-in redundancies, once a local 
9–1–1  center  fails,  there  is  no  backup.  But  digital  technology  can  fix  this  problem. 
S.  1063  (which  I  introduced  and  is  cosponsored  by  Senators  Burns,  Snowe,  Clin-
ton,  and  Kerry)  would  require  the  Federal  Government  and  industry  to  develop  a 
plan  to  quickly  move  the  Nation’s  emergency  networks  from  the  old  analog  system 
to  a  more  robust,  Internet-based  network.  This  updated  system  would  allow  emer-
gency  phone  calls  to  be  automatically  rerouted  from  a  damaged  9–1–1  call  center 
to the next nearest call center. LIVES WILL BE SAVED. 

This  bill  also  ensures  that  the  millions  of  people  who  use  Internet  phone  service 

would be able to have full E–9–1–1 capabilities. 

I thank the Co-Chairs of this committee for their supportive words about S. 1063, 
which  was  introduced  last  May.  The  recent  hurricanes  show  that  it’s  time  for  this 
committee to pass this bill and move it to the full Senate. 

I look forward to hearing the witnesses, and I thank the Chair. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Today,  the  Committee  continues  its  examination  of  the  effectiveness  of  our  Na-
tion’s  communications  networks  in  the  wake  of  Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita  and 
now  turns  its  attention  to  the  communications  challenges  faced  by  first  responders 
in times of crisis as a result of the devastation caused to the physical infrastructure 
and the lack of interoperable equipment. 

While  today’s  hearing  will  inevitably  focus  on  how  to  ensure  communications 
‘‘interoperability,’’  among  first  responders,  we  must  not  lose  sight  of  the  fact  that 
New  Orleans  had  in  place  an  interoperable  communications  system,  but  when  the 
basic  communications  capabilities  failed  that  system  was  rendered  useless.  There-
fore,  even  if  interoperable  communications  systems  are  developed  and  deployed, 
they  will  provide  little  help  if  the  communications  network  itself  does  not  survive 
the disaster. 

A key step to ensuring that the Nation is prepared for the next disaster requires 
us  not  only  to  focus  on  obtaining  the  latest  and  greatest  technology,  but  also  on 
building  and  maintaining  resilient  networks.  I  hope  that  the  witnesses  today  will 
help us understand what steps can be taken to ensure that terrestrial networks are 
constructed  with  foresight  to  anticipate  and  harden  against  failures.  Additionally, 
this  Nation  must  plan  for  worst-case  scenarios  by  integrating  redundant  systems, 
both terrestrial and satellite, for situations where the best laid plans fail to prevent 
communications outages. 

Turning  to  the  crisis-level  lack  of  interoperability  that  has  plagued  our  first  re-
sponders since September 11, Congress must make policy decisions that will stimu-
late the development and deployment of emergency ready, interoperable, redundant 
wired,  wireless  and  satellite  networks.  The  lack  of  interoperability  cannot  blithely 
be blamed on a single issue. This breakdown is occurring on several levels. 

(41) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

To  ensure  robust  interoperability,  in  the  most  basic  terms,  there  are  several  key 
elements  that  must  be  addressed.  First,  we  need  to  ensure  that  proper  planning, 
coordination  and  training  exercises  are  implemented  in  advance  of  a  disaster.  To 
have  emergency  readiness,  we  must  be  emergency  tested.  Second,  we  need  tech-
nology that is capable of communicating seamlessly between and among the affected 
first responders at the local, state and Federal level, regardless of equipment or fre-
quencies  utilized.  Third,  we  need  to  allocate  the  necessary  spectrum  to  enable  ro-
bust  communications  systems  to  be  built.  Fourth,  we  must  establish  a  system  of 
quality  control  to  ensure  the  technology  developed  for  use  in  these  systems  is  reli-
able.  Finally,  we  need  to  provide  funding  to  deploy  and  maintain  these  systems. 
None  of  these  elements  alone  will  solve  our  interoperability  failures.  They  must  all 
be  addressed  in  a  coordinated  manner  or  leave  our  Nation  vulnerable  in  the  face 
of future disasters whether natural or man-made. 
I look forward to the testimony of the witnesses. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:41 Jun 20, 2011 Jkt 066932 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\66932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

